<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88901-0014 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-01-88.f2.A1013</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 170 / Thursday, September 1, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 264 and 265</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRL-3361-6]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Standards Applicable to Owners and Operators of Hazardous Waste Treatment,Storage, and Disposal Facilities; Liability Coverage</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>On August 21, 1985, the Environmental Protection Agency(EPA or the Agency) published a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking to amendthe financial responsibility requirements concerning liability coveragefor owners and operators of hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposalfacilities (TSDFs) permitted under the Resource Conservation and RecoveryAct (RCRA) (50 FR 33902). The proposal set forth several regulatory options,including the authorization of additional financial mechanisms for coveringthird-party liability requirements, under consideration by the Agency toprovide relief for owners and operators who encounter difficulties in obtainingliability insurance. On July 11, 1986, EPA published an interim final ruleallowing use of a corporate guarantee as an additional financial responsibilitymechanism (51 FR 25350). This rule was issued in final form on November18, 1987 (52 FR 44314).EPA is today adopting other financial mechanisms for liability coveragefor RCRA TSDFs. These mechanisms are letters of credit, surety bonds, trustfunds, and guarantees provided by firms that are not the direct parentof the owner or operator. In addition, the Agency is clarifying the liabilityinsurance requirements to ensure that other firms can purchase insurancefor owners and operators of hazardous waste management facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>October 3, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>The regulatory docket for this rulemaking is availablefor public inspection at Room S-212-E, U.S. EPA, 401 M Street, SW., Washington,DC 20460, from 9:00 a.m. to 4:00 p.m., Monday through Friday, excludingFederal holidays. The docket number is F-88-CGF1-FFFFF. The public mustmake an appointment to review docket materials by calling (202) 475-9327.The public may copy a maximum of 50 pages from any one regulatory docketat no cost. Additional copies cost $0.20 per page.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>The RCRA Hotline, toll free,at (800) 424-9346 or, in Washington, DC, at (202) 382-3000. For technicalinformation, contact Carlos M. Lago, Office of Solid Waste (WH-563), U.S.Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street, SW., Washington, DC 20460,(202) 382-4780.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The contents of today's preamble arelisted in the following outline:<ITAG tagnum="26">I. Authority</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Background</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Current Liability Coverage Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. August 21, 1985, Notice of Proposed Rulemaking</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Rulemaking Authorizing the Corporate Guarantee</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Justification for Today's Rule</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">E. Key Provisions of Today's Rule</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">III. Additional Financial Responsibility Mechanisms Being Authorizedfor Liability Coverage</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Letter of Credit</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Surety Bond</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Guarantee</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Trust Fund</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">E. Purchase of Insurance by Other Firms</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">F. Allowable Combinations of Mechanisms</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IV. Special Provisions of Additional Mechanisms</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Beneficiaries</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Payment Trigger</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Certification of Validity and Enforceability</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Cancellation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">E. Exclusions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">V. Other Issues Presented in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Maintain, Suspend, or Withdraw Existing Liability Coverage Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Revise Scope and Levels of Coverage</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Mechanisms Considered But Not Adopted</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Authorize Waivers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VI. Consistency with Other Existing and Proposed Financial AssuranceRequirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VII. Technical Correction to 40 CFR 264.151(b)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VIII. Effective Date</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IX. State Authority</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Applicability of Rules in Authorized States</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Effect of Rule on State Authorizations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">X. Executive Order 12291</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XI. Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XII. Supporting Documents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Authority</ITAG>This regulation is being adopted under the authority of sections 2002(a),3004, and 3005 of the Solid Waste Disposal Act; as amended by RCRA, asamended (42 U.S.C. 6912(a), 6924, and 6925).<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Background</ITAG>A. Current Liability Coverage RequirementsSection 3004(a)(6) of RCRA, as amended, requires EPA to establish financialresponsibility standards for owners and operators of hazardous waste managementfacilities as may be necessary or desirable to protect human health andthe environment.On April 16, 1982, EPA promulgated regulations requiring owners or operatorsto demonstrate liability coverage during the operating life of the facilityfor bodily injury and/or property damage to third parties resulting fromaccidental occurrences arising from facility operations (47 FR 16554).Under these regulations (40 CFR 264.147 and 265.147), an owner or operatorof a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility must demonstrate,on a per-firm basis, liability coverage for sudden accidental occurrencesin the amount of $1 million per occurrence and $2 million annual aggregate,exclusive of legal defense costs. An owner or operator of a surface impoundment,landfill, or land treatment facility used to manage hazardous waste isalso required to demonstrate, on a per-firm basis, liability coverage fornonsudden accidental occurrences in the amount of $3 million per occurrenceand $6 million annual aggregate, exclusive of legal defense costs. (A ``nonsuddenaccidental occurrence,'' as opposed to a ``sudden accidental occurrence,''is defined by 40 CFR 264.141 and 265.141 as an occurrence that takes placeover time and involves continuous or repeated exposure.) ``First-dollar''coverage is required; that is, the amount of any deductible must be coveredby the insurer, who may have a right of reimbursement of the deductibleamount from the insured.The requirements for coverage of sudden accidental occurrences became effectiveon July 15, 1982. The requirements for nonsudden accidental occurrenceswere phased in gradually according to annual dollar sales or revenue figuresof the owner or operator. January 16, 1985, was the final phase-in date.Financial responsibility for third-party liability currently can be demonstratedby obtaining insurance, by passing a financial test, or by obtaining acorporate guarantee from a parent corporation that passes the financialtest. The regulations (40 CFR 264.147(a)(3), 264.147(b)(3), 265.147(a)(3),and 265.147(b)(3)) also allow an owner or operator to meet the liabilityrequirements through a combination of the financial test and insurance,or a combination of the corporate guarantee and insurance.B. August 21, 1985, Notice of Proposed RulemakingIn 1984-1985, the availability of pollution liability insurance policiesbegan to decline. A number of insurers who previously had offered coverageceased to write pollution liability policies. Those still offering coverageraised their premiums substantially while reducing the coverage provided.As a consequence, some owners and operators of hazardous waste TSDFs beganto experience difficulties in obtaining necessary coverage and/or payingthe increased cost of such coverage.In response to this situation, EPA took a number of steps, including issuingon August 21, 1985, a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) (50 FR 33902)requesting comment on five possible regulatory options as responses tothe problem of reduced availability and increased cost of pollution liabilityinsurance: (1) Maintain the existing requirements; (2) clarify the requiredscope of coverage and/or lower the required levels of coverage; (3) authorizeother financial responsibility mechanisms; (4) authorize waivers; and (5)suspend or withdraw the liability coverage requirements.EPA received numerous comments from four major categories of commenterson the August 21, 1985, NPRM: Owners and operators of hazardous waste TSDFs;members of the insurance industry; representatives of State and local governments;and members of the public at large. A majority of commenters encouragedthe Agency to retain the existing coverage limits and encouraged the Agencynot to suspend or withdraw the liability coverage requirements. Numerouscommenters did, however, ask EPA to consider waivers in certain circumstances.Some commenters requested EPA to clarify the scope of coverage requiredor to lower the required limits of coverage, but many commenters urgedEPA to authorize additional financial mechanisms that would provide analternative to insurance. Commenters specifically mentioned mechanismssuch as corporate guarantees, surety bonds, letters of credit, and trustfunds for use for liability coverage. The commenters, however, did notdiscuss in detail any of these mechanisms.Upon analysis of comments received, studies of the cost and availabilityof the instruments, analysis of the suitability of proposed financial instrumentsfor liability coverage, and consultation with banks and State insurancecommissioners, EPA has decided to maintain the existing coverage requirements,while authorizing additional financial responsibility mechanisms for liabilitycoverage. Sections III and V of this preamble discuss the mechanisms beingauthorized and existing approaches to waivers. The Agency's summary ofand responses to comments urging it to change existing requirements onthe scope and levels of coverage are provided in Section V of this preamble.Additionally, more specific discussion and response to comments is foundin documents included in the docket for today's rule.C. Rulemaking Authorizing the Corporate GuaranteeIn response to the commenters on the August 21, 1985 NPRM who argued thatEPA should authorize other financial instruments for liability coverage,EPA examined several additional mechanisms for liability coverage. Commentersparticularly encouraged EPA to authorize a corporate guarantee for liabilitycoverage, noting that such guarantees were already authorized as financialassurance mechanisms for closure and post-closure care (40 CFR 264.143(f),264.145(f), 265.143(e), and 265.145(e)). In response, on July 11, 1986,the Agency issued an interim final rule revising 40 CFR 264.147, 264.151,and 265.147 to authorize, in addition to insurance and the financial test,the use of a corporate guarantee for liability coverage (51 FR 25350).The Agency subsequently made minor revisions to the rule authorizing thecorporate guarantee for liability coverage, and finalized that rule onNovember 18, 1987 (52 FR 44314). As discussed in Section III of this preamble,today's rule further expands the availability of the guarantee by allowingfirms that are not the direct corporate parent of the owner or operatorto be the guarantor.D. Justification for Today's RuleThe Agency believes that additional mechanisms for liability coverage aredesirable in order to provide a broad set of options for owners or operatorswho must demonstrate liability coverage but who cannot use one of the existingmechanisms. Although commentary concerning the insurance industry in theInsurance Trade Press and in other sources suggests that underwriting lossesin property-casualty insurance peaked around the end of 1985 and that theoutlook for the future is more favorable,\1\<NOTE/> the market for Environmental Impairment Liability (EIL) insurancehas remained constrained.\2\<NOTE/> Accordingly, the Agency is seeking to ensure that as manyalternative financial assurance mechanisms as possible are available tothe regulated community, to reduce the problem created by the constrainedinsurance market.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ United States General Accounting Office, Statement byWilliam J. Anderson before the House of Representatives on ``Profitabilityof the Property/Casualty Insurance Industry,'' March 13, 1986.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ National Association of Insurance Commissioners, ``Reportof the NAIC Advisory Committee on Environmental Liability Insurance,''September, 1986; and ``Business Insurance,'' April 16, 1987, p. 58; May4, 1987, p. 22; and May 11, 1987, p. 71.Section 3010(b) of RCRA provides that regulations promulgated under SubtitleC of the statute and revisions to existing Subtitle C regulations generallytake effect six months after promulgation. However, the period prior tothe effective date may be shortened if the Administrator finds the regulatedcommunity does not need six months to come into compliance or for othergood cause. As the regulation does not add any additional compliance requirementsand a six-month period prior to implementation would be contrary to theinterest of the regulated community and public by delaying the availabilityof other compliance mechanisms, the regulatory changes are being issuedas a final rule effective 30 days after publication.E. Key Provisions of Today's RuleIn today's rule, EPA authorizes owners or operators of hazardous wasteTSDFs to use the following additional financial assurance mechanisms forliability coverage: A letter of credit; a surety bond assuring paymentof liability claims; a fully-funded trust fund; and a guarantee providedby a firm that is not the direct parent of the owner or operator. The Agencyis generally not revising the scope and levels of coverage required forthird-party liabilities. However, today's rule includes amendments clarifyingthe liability coverage requirements to allow other firms to purchase insurancefor owners and operators. Finally, EPA is specifying more clearly the aggregateamount of coverage that must be provided by financial responsibility mechanismsthat offer combined coverage for sudden and nonsudden occurrences.<ITAG tagnum="85">III. Additional Financial Responsibility Mechanisms Being Authorizedfor Liability Coverage</ITAG>In determining which additional financial assurance mechanisms to approvefor liability coverage, EPA reviewed the other financial assurance programswithin EPA, other Federal agencies, and several States. The Agency firstanalyzed the financial mechanisms already approved for use for closureor post-closure care financial assurance since the regulated communitycould be expected to be familiar with them. Many of these mechanisms werementioned by commenters on the August 21, 1985 NPRM as potentially useful.Other EPA financial assurance requirements or proposed requirements, suchas the requirements for underground injection wells and underground storagetanks, were also reviewed to identify the mechanisms, if any, used in thoseprograms for third-party liability coverage.The Agency considered several characteristics of the mechanisms that couldaffect their suitability for the coverage of third-party liability claims,including (1) availability; (2) cost; (3) whether they are likely to bevalid and enforceable contracts under special provisions of State law,such as laws regulating the business of insurance; and (4) whether theyare capable of being set up in ways that do not require EPA to act as a``claims adjuster'' or otherwise act to determine the merits of third-partyliability claims brought against TSDF owners or operators.On the basis of these analyses, EPA determined that letters of credit,surety bonds, guarantees, and trust funds provide adequate third-partyliability coverage. The rationale for authorization of these instrumentsis described below in the discussion of each instrument.Other mechanisms suggested by the commenters on the August 1985 NPRM andanalyzed by EPA included security interests, indemnity contracts, reservefunds, captive insurance pools, and government-supplied insurance or loanguarantees. As discussed in Section V of today's preamble, EPA has concludedthat these instruments are inappropriate, with the exception of captiveinsurance pools and risk retention groups. Captive insurance pools andrisk retention groups are authorized under the current regulations.The financial mechanisms authorized in today's rulemaking, with the exceptionof the guarantee, are currently approved mechanisms for closure or post-closurecare under 40 CFR Parts 264 and 265, Subpart H. (Performance bonds, whichare authorized for use by owners or operators of permitted facilities forassurance for closure and post-closure care, are not included because theyare not adaptable to liability coverage; instead, an analogous mechanism,the payment bond, is allowed.) The requirements for these financial mechanismsparallel the requirements for financial mechanisms authorized for closureor post-closure care. However, some provisions of the mechanisms have beenadjusted to address issues that arise only in the context of liabilityclaims. Features of the mechanisms that differ include the designationof the beneficiary, exclusions for categories of damages and obligations,the claims-payment trigger, the certification of validity and enforceability,and cancellation provisions. These features are described more fully inSection IV of today's preamble.A. Letter of CreditToday's rule authorizes owners or operators of hazardous waste TSDFs touse letters of credit to satisfy the RCRA third-party liability coveragerequirements (40 CFR 264.147(a)(3), 264.147(b)(3), 265.147(a)(3), and 265.147(b)(3)).Letters of credit are commitments by a financial institution (e.g., a bank),whose letter of credit operations are regulated and examined by a Stateor Federal agency, to provide funds if appropriate documents are presented.In general, letters of credit are instruments that can be adapted for variouspurposes.\3\<NOTE/> Banks contacted by EPA have indicated that they would considerissuing letters of credit for liability claims for their established customers.EPA believes that letters of credit may be more readily available to ownersor operators than many other mechanisms, if the owner or operator has anestablished relationship with a qualifying financial institution and canprovide adequate collateral.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ U.S. General Accounting Office, Staff Study, ``FinancialServices_Developments in the Financial Guarantee Industry,'' GAO/GGD-87-84,June 25, 1987, pp. 9-13, 17-18 discusses letters of credit as financialguarantees.1. <T3>Features of Mechanism. </T3>A letter of credit is a financial instrumentunder which an issuing institution (the issuer), generally a bank, undertakesto meet a monetary obligation of its customer (the account party) if thebank is presented with specified documents. The issuer, in return for afee, becomes the primary obligor. A third party, the beneficiary, initiatespayment by making a claim directly on the issuer. Thus, a letter of creditis an instrument that substitutes the issuer's superior credit for theaccount party's credit.The instrument authorized in today's rule is an irrevocable stand-by letterof credit in which the third-party beneficiaries are any and all personswho may be damaged by a hazardous waste release from the facility whoseowner or operator has secured the letter of credit. The irrevocable natureof the instrument precludes its cancellation prior to the end of a requiredone-year term by the issuer or the owner or operator. After the one-yearterm, the letter of credit will automatically renew for another year unless,120 days before the expiration date, the issuer notifies the owner or operatorand the Regional Administrator of a decision not to renew the credit (40CFR 264.151(k)).2. <T3>Who May Provide A Letter of Credit. </T3>Today's rule provides thatletters of credit for liability coverage must be provided by an authorizedfinancial institution regulated by a Federal or State agency (40 CFR 264.147(h)(2)and 265.147(h)(2)). EPA has established these requirements, which parallelthe requirements for letters of credit providing assurance for closureor post-closure care, to ensure the financial viability of the issuer ofthe letter of credit. The viability of the commercial banks and savingsand loan institutions that may issue letters of credit is scrutinized byseveral oversight organizations, including the Federal Reserve, the FederalDeposit Insurance Corporation, the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation,the Comptroller of the Currency, and State banking commissioners. Theseregulatory bodies attempt to ensure that regulated institutions take actionsnecessary to avoid bankruptcies. EPA concluded that it would be duplicativeto establish additional requirements to ensure the solvency of bank andsavings and loan institutions issuing letters of credit.3. <T3>Validity of Letter of Credit Providing Liability Coverage. </T3>Toensure that letters of credit may be used to provide liability coverage,EPA reviewed the status of legal doctrines that might call into questionthe authority of a bank to issue a letter of credit for liability coverage,and concluded that no significant legal obstacles currently exist to suchuse of letters of credit. EPA believes that the proposed use of lettersof credit in today's rule is analogous to the use of a letter of creditin situations that courts have approved. The Agency, therefore, concludedthat use of a letter of credit for financial assurance for third-partyliability coverage is both valid and enforceable.B. Surety BondToday's rule authorizes owners and operators of hazardous waste TSDFs touse surety bonds to satisfy the RCRA third-party liability requirements(40 CFR 264.147(a)(4), 264.147(b)(4), 265.147(a)(4), and 265.147(b)(4)).The adoption of surety bonds as an additional assurance mechanism for liabilitycoverage was widely advocated by the commenters on the August 21, 1985,NPRM.1. <T3>Features of Mechanism. </T3>Surety bonds represent agreements betweenthree parties: The principal (i.e., the facility owner or operator); theobligee (i.e., third-party liability claimants) to whom the principal promisesto complete a specific act; and the surety, who assures the obligee thatthe principal will fulfill its obligation and, if the principal fails,that the surety will fulfill the principal's obligation to the obligee.Thus, the surety bond authorized today guarantees that if the owner oroperator fails to satisfy valid third-party claims, the surety will paysuch claims. A surety company is entitled to reimbursement from the principalwhen it makes a payment under a bond.There are two types of surety bonds: payment bonds and performance bonds.Payment bonds guarantee that the principal will pay a certain sum to identifiedparties under the conditions named in the bond, and if the principal failsto make the payment or payments, the surety will make the payment or payments.Performance bond guarantees that the principal will perform a certain actand, if the principal fails, that the surety will either perform the actfor the principal or pay someone else to perform it. The surety bond providedin today's rule is a payment bond, because the obligation it guaranteesis limited to the principal's payment of third-party liability claims tosatisfy the Subtitle C liability requirements.A surety company's liability under a payment bond is limited to the ``penalsum,'' which is the amount of coverage guaranteed by the bond. The penalsum of the payment bond being authorized by today's rule has two parts,the per-occurrence limit and the annual aggregate limit (40 CFR 264.151(1)).If the payment bond covers claims resulting from both sudden accidentaloccurrences and nonsudden accidental occurrences, a separate penal sumwill be identified for each type of coverage (i.e., such a bond would havefour penal sums).The payment bond authorized in today's rule will remain in effect unlessand until the surety notifies the owner or operator and the Regional Administratorof proposed cancellation by certified mail. Cancellation will become effective120 days from the receipt of notification (40 CFR 264.151(1), conditionsclause (7)).2. <T3>Who May Provide Surety Bonds. </T3>Today's rule requires that suretycompanies issuing payment bonds to assure liability coverage must be listedby the Department of Treasury in Treasury ``Circular 570'' as surety companiesthat may issue bonds to the Federal government (40 CFR 264.147(i)(2) and265.147(i)(2)). This requirement parallels the closure and post-closurecare financial assurance regulations and other financial assurance requirementsinvolving surety bonds and assures that the surety company is subject toregulatory oversight by some government agency. To qualify for such a listing,surety companies must comply with the law and regulations of the Departmentof Treasury (as specified in sections 9304 and 9308 of Title 31 of theUnited States Code). The names of the companies meeting these Treasuryrequirements are published on July 1 of each year by the Department ofthe Treasury in ``Circular 570; Surety Companies Acceptable on FederalBonds.''3. <T3>Validity of Surety Bond Providing Liability Coverage. </T3>EPA hascontacted several State insurance commissions to determine if States wouldview a surety bond for third-party liability coverage as subject to theState insurance laws. In a number of States, surety companies are alreadyregulated by the State agency that is responsible for insurance. EPA foundthat in other States, the issue of whether the surety bond constitutesinsurance may be examined on a case-by-case (i.e., facility-by-facilityor bond-by-bond) basis. Many States may consider it necessary for the firmproviding the surety bond to qualify under the State's surety or insurancelaws as an insurer. To address this issue, the rule does not allow ownersor operators to use a surety bond to demonstrate financial assurance unlessthe Attorneys General or Insurance Commissioners in the States in whichthe surety is incorporated and in which the facilities covered by the bondare located certify that the mechanism is valid and enforceable (40 CFR264.147(i)(4) and 265.147(i)(4)). (See Section IV.C of this preamble forfurther discussion.)C. GuaranteeToday's rule extends the use of guarantees for liability coverage to allowguarantees provided by firms that are not the direct parents of facilityowners or operators (40 CFR 264.147(g)(1) and 265.147(g)(1)). The use ofa parent corporate guarantee for liability coverage was authorized in aninterim final rule on July 11, 1986 (51 FR 5350) and promulgated as a finalregulation on November 18, 1987 (52 FR 44314). Under this rule, liabilitycoverage may be provided by parent firms that directly own at least 50percent of the voting stock of a subsidiary firm. Several commenters onthe interim final rule urged EPA to allow non-parent firms to provide guarantees.After analyzing the validity and enforceability of guarantee contractsby non-parent firms, the Agency is authorizing guarantees provided by corporategrandparents and by a corporate ``sibling'' firm (a firm whose parent corporationis also the parent corporation of the owner or operator). The Agency alsois allowing guarantees by other related and unrelated firms, provided thatsuch firms have a substantial business relationship with the owner or operator.The guarantee in today's rule incorporates the features of the November18, 1987 rule for parent guarantees with minor revisions necessary to addressnon-parent guarantees and to ensure consistency with the other instrumentsallowed by today's rule. Since today's rule incorporates the features ofthis earlier rule, an extensive discussion of the guarantee has not beenincluded in this preamble. Only the distinctive features of the non-parentcorporate guarantee, the definition of who may provide the guarantee, andthe basis upon which EPA concluded that it would be a valid and enforceablemechanism are discussed below.1. <T3>Features of Mechanism. </T3>The authorized guarantee is an instrumentby which a firm promises to pay the liability obligations of the owneror operator is the owner or operator does not do so. The firm providingthe guarantee (the guarantor) must submit proof that it passes the financialtest requirements of andSection;andSection;264.147(f)(1) or 265.147(f)(1).If the guarantor subsequently becomes unable to pass the financial test,the owner or operator must obtain another financial assurance mechanismfor liability coverage.2. <T3>Who May Provide Guarantees. </T3>Today's rule extends EPA's authorizationof corporate guarantees beyond the previously allowed parent guaranteeto include multi-tier guarantees by corporate grandparents, cross-streamguarantees by corporate siblings, and guarantees by firms with a ``substantialbusiness relationship'' with the owner or operator. In general, today'srule authorizes three types of guarantees between corporations: (1) A guaranteeby a parent corporation or principal shareholder of a subsidiary (a ``downstream''guarantee), (2) a guarantee by a sibling corporation (a ``cross-stream''guarantee), and (3) a guarantee by a firm that has a ``substantial businessrelationship'' with the corporation that receives the guarantee (40 CFR264.147(g)(1) and 265.147(g)(1)).A simple single-tier downstream guarantee is one where the direct parentcorporation guarantees the obligation of its subsidiary. A multi-tier downstreamguarantee (consisting of three tiers of ownership, for example) is a guaranteeby which the corporate grandparent or great grandparent (i.e., the ultimateowner of the subsidiary) provides a guarantee for the subsidiary. A cross-streamguarantee is a guarantee between sibling corporations, e.g., a ``brother''subsidiary's guarantee of a ``sister'' subsidiary where the siblings areowned by the same parent. Both of these categories of guarantees have beentested in legal actions and are considered strong and binding legal obligationsalthough analyses of guarantees between siblings typically assume thatsome economic relationship exists between the two corporations aside fromthe guarantee.If the guarantee is being provided by a corporate grandparent or sibling,the guarantor must provide the guarantee to the owner or operator directly,irrespective of the number of intervening levels of ownership that existin the corporate structure (40 CFR 264.147(g)(1) and 265.147(g)(1)). Forexample, a corporate grandparent would provide a guarantee for the owneror operator's firm directly, not through the corporate parent.Today's rule also authorizes unrelated firms and other related firms, asidefrom parents and siblings, that have a ``substantial business relationship''with the owner or operator of a hazardous waste facility to provide guarantees(40 CFR 264.147(g) and 265.147(g)). In authorizing guarantees by theseother related and unrelated firms, EPA sought to ensure that a valid andenforceable contract was created. To this end, the Agency is requiringthese firms to demonstrate a substantial business relationship with theowner or operator to ensure that the guarantee is a valid contract. Underfundamental principles of contract law, contracts must be supported by``consideration.'' Consideration is generally defined as a legal detrimentthat has been bargained for and exchanged for the promise. The generalprinciple underlying the concept of consideration is that the law willnot enforce gratuitous promises.The issue of consideration arises in the context of all guarantees; however,parent and sibling firms authorized to issue guarantees under today's rulecan demonstrate consideration by the inherent benefits or detriments thataccrue to the guarantor firm by virtue of its corporate relationship withthe owner or operator. As noted above, courts have generally recognizedthat guarantees offered by a parent or sibling corporation are valid andenforceable. EPA believes that other related and unrelated firms shouldbe able to demonstrate sufficient consideration for the contract if theyhave a substantial business relationship with the owner or operator.The Agency's review of legal literature indicated that a sufficiently closebusiness relationship between two firms could be comparable to the sharedeconomic interests that typify the relationship between corporate siblingsand between a parent and its subsidiary. Because it is these mutual economicinterests that underlie the validity and enforceability of downstream andcross-stream guarantees, the existence of such interests between othertypes of firms should enable guarantees between these firms also to bevalid and enforceable. No single legal definition exists of what constitutesa business relationship between two firms that would justify upholdinga guarantee between them. Furthermore, such a determination would dependupon the application of the laws of the States of the involved parties.Thus, in defining the underlying business relationship that produces anacceptable guarantee, the Agency provides a broad framework for analyzingbusiness relationships while acknowledging the primary role of State law.In today's rule, EPA is defining substantial business relationship to mean``the extent of a business relationship necessary under applicable Statelaw to make a guarantee contract issued incident to that relationship validand enforceable. A `substantial business relationship' must arise froma pattern of recent or ongoing business transactions, in addition to theguarantee itself, such that a currently existing business relationshipbetween the guarantor and the owner or operator is demonstrated to thesatisfaction of the applicable EPA Regional Administrator'' (40 CFR 264.141(h)).A guarantee contract, by itself, would be inadequate to demonstrate a substantialbusiness relationship between two parties. However, an existing contractto supply goods or services, separate from the guarantee contract, couldsupply evidence of such a relationship. An example of such an arrangementmight be a contract for hazardous waste disposal between a generator anda disposal facility. Evidence demonstrating such a substantial businessrelationship is required to be provided in the letter from the Chief FinancialOfficer of the guarantor.In addition to demonstrating the existence of a substantial business relationship,these other related and unrelated guarantors must describe the value thatthey received in consideration for the guarantee contract. In some cases,preexisting business relationships, no matter how substantial, will beinsufficient by themselves to demonstrate consideration because they willnot have been bargained for to induce the promise in the guarantee contract.For this reason, these guarantors must also describe the considerationfor the contract in the letter from their Chief Financial Officer.EPA considered as a preliminary matter whether corporate guarantees wouldbe regulated as insurance contracts under States' insurance laws. EPA wasconcerned that guarantors could subject themselves to States' insurancelaws through the issuance of guarantees. This issue has arisen in otherof the Agency's financial responsibility rulemakings, including the proposedfinancial responsibility requirements for underground storage tanks containingpetroleum (52 FR 12786, April 17, 1987). A discussion of the applicabilityof State insurance laws to various mechanisms, including corporate guarantees,is contained in the docket for that rulemaking, in the ``Supporting Documentfor Proposed Underground Storage Tanks Containing Petroleum_Financial ResponsibilityRequirements.'' That discussion indicates that States' insurance statutesand regulatory bodies have varying ways of describing their jurisdictionover guarantees, oftentimes dependent on the precise circumstances surroundingthe transaction. Thus, the Agency cannot state with any certainty whetherany particular guarantee would subject the guarantor to a State's insurancelaws. Therefore, the responsibility rests on owners and operators to obtainguarantees that are valid and enforceable and on prospective guarantorsto ascertain and comply with the State laws they would subject themselvesto if they were to provide guarantees. As discussed in Section IV.C oftoday's preamble, the first responsibility cited is accomplished by requiringa certification from the Attorney General or Insurance Commissioner ofthe State in which the guarantor is incorporated and of each State in whicha facility covered by the guarantee is located. 3. <T3>Validity of Non-Parent Guarantee Providing Liability Coverage. </T3>Somecommenters questioned whether non-parent guarantees would provide assuranceequivalent to that provided by a parent guarantee. The Agency concludedthat adequate assurance will be provided by these ``intercorporate'' guarantees.Intercorporate guarantees are a common means of assuring a lender thatits loan will be repaid. In particular, ``cross-stream'' guarantees, whichare from a ``brother'' subsidiary to a ``sister'' subsidiary where bothfirms are owned by the same corporate parent, are a typical business practice.Normally, collection of funds assured by intercorporate guarantees is acomparatively simple matter of contract enforcement. In unusual circumstances, such as the situation where the guarantor declaresbankruptcy, efforts could be made to avoid the guaranteed obligation. Certainprovisions of the Federal bankruptcy code (11 U.S.C.A. 544(b) and 548(a)(2))allow avoidance of obligations that deplete the debtor's assets to thedetriment of its creditors. If, while the guarantor was involved in bankruptcyproceedings, a liability claim was presented to it for payment, a questioncould arise over whether bankruptcy laws would enable it to avoid satisfyingthe claim because the payment would deplete its assets to the detrimentof its creditors. Under section 548(a)(2) of the Federal bankruptcy code,a trustee in bankruptcy may avoid payments made to any party within a yearbefore the debtor filed bankruptcy if (1) the debtor was insolvent at thattime and (2) the debtor did not receive ``reasonably equivalent value''in return for the transfer. Section 544(b) essentially enables similaractions to be pursued under applicable State laws. Intercorporate guarantees, however, should not be vulnerable to such actionsif the owner or operator receives reasonably equivalent value in returnfor the guarantee. In effect, this reasonably equivalent value serves asconsideration supporting the guarantee contract, similar to the guarantorhaving a ``substantial business relationship'' with the owner or operator.According to most authorities, there is no difficulty in finding reasonablyequivalent value in downstream guarantees, where the guarantor is higherin the corporate hierarchy (e.g., a direct or higher-tier parent) thanthe subsidiary receiving the guarantee. The subsidiary relationship ofa firm to its direct or higher-tier parent is almost always considereda benefit to that parent. In cross-stream guarantees from one subsidiaryof a parent to another subsidiary of that same parent, demonstrating reasonablyequivalent value is more difficult because the subsidiary to which theguarantee is given is not an asset of the other subsidiary serving as theguarantor. In order to obviate any question about reasonably equivalentvalue in cross-stream guarantees, therefore, the Agency is requiring across-stream guarantor to describe in the Chief Financial Officer's Letter(andSection; 264.151(g)) the value of the consideration that accrued to itfrom the guarantee. The Agency has also concluded that adequate assurance that obligationswill not be avoided in the event of bankruptcy will be provided by guaranteesmade by other related firms (i.e., not corporate siblings or parents) andunrelated firms which demonstrate a substantial business relationship withthe owner or operator. As with intercorporate guarantees, collection offunds in most cases will merely be a matter of contract enforcement. Inthe event of bankruptcy of the guarantor, however, it is particularly importantthat the guarantee be written so as to demonstrate clearly that the guarantorhas received reasonably equivalent value in consideration for the guarantee.As discussed above, the Agency is requiring these guarantors to describein the Chief Financial Officer's Letter (andSection; 264.151(g)) both thenature of the substantial business relationship and the value derived fromthe guarantee.D. Trust Fund Today's rule authorizes owners or operators of hazardous waste facilitiesto use trust funds to demonstrate financial responsibility for third-partyliability coverage (40 CFR 264.147(a)(5), 264.147(b)(5), 265.147(a)(5),and 265.147(b)(5)), if assets sufficient to cover the full amount of theassurance to be provided by the trust fund are placed in the fund beforeit becomes effective (i.e., the trust must be fully funded ``up-front'')(40 CFR 264.147(j)(3) and 265.147(j)(3)). Several comments received onthe August 21, 1985 NPRM supported the use of trust funds to demonstratefinancial responsibility for third-party liability coverage. 1. <T3>Features of Mechanism. </T3>A trust fund is an arrangement in whicha separate legal entity, the trust, is created to hold property or fundsfor the benefit of another. At least three parties are necessary undertrust agreements: the grantor, who establishes and funds the trust; thetrustee, who has a fiduciary responsibility over the property placed inthe trust by the grantor; and the beneficiary, the person (or group ofpeople) for whom the arrangement is made. The most significant featureof a trust fund is the shift of legal ownership of the property in thetrust from the grantor to the trustee when the trust is established andfunded. The trust document or trust agreement determines the allocation of rights,duties, and responsibilities among the parties to any trust. The trustee,in return for a fee, has a fiduciary responsibility to manage the fundaccording to the rules specified in the agreement. This agreement alsodefines the limits of a trustee's liability. In addition, a trust agreementstates the manner in which payments are made into and out of the trust,as well as the grounds upon which the trust can be terminated. 2. <T3>Validity of Trust Fund for Liability Coverage. </T3>A trust used asa financial assurance mechanism should have a fund balance equal to theamount of coverage being demonstrated. The trust agreement may allow apay-in period during which the grantor makes payments of specified amountsinto the trust until the trust is fully funded. The length of the pay-inperiod typically is designed such that the trust fund balance equals therequired amount of coverage before funds are needed for the assured activity.Because liability coverage may be needed immediately, the trust in today'srule must be fully paid up at the time it is relied upon for financialassurance. The trust also may not be cancelled unless and until an alternatefinancial assurance mechanism is in place. A fully funded trust providesa high degree of assurance because funds, up to the required amount ofcoverage, are set aside specifically for the purpose of liability coverage.To ensure that the full amount of coverage is available each year in whichowner or operator must provide financial assurance, the Agency is requiringboth that the trust fund be fully funded immediately and, in addition,if a liability claim is paid out of the trust fund balance, the owner oroperator is required to refinance the trust annually up to the amount ofthe required coverage on or before the anniversary date of the establishmentof the fund to satisfy the annual aggregate requirement of andSection;andSection;264.147 and 265.147. Although some owners and operators may conclude that the cost of fundinga trust as the sole financial assurance mechanism is prohibitive, theymay find it desirable to use a trust fund in combination with one or moreother mechanisms. For example, owners and operators who purchase insurancepolicies that do not provide the full amount of aggregate coverage mightuse trust funds to demonstrate financial responsibility for the amountsof the aggregate not covered by the insurance policy. E. Purchase of Insurance by Other Firms Under the current liability requirements, proof of adequate insurance coveragecan be provided by either a certificate of insurance or an endorsement.A certificate of insurance is a statement obtained from the insurer certifyingthat it has issued insurance as represented in the certificate. The certificateis not a part of the policy, but can be used to demonstrate the existenceof the policy. An endorsement is a form attached to the policy that describesthe original terms of the policy and any amendments to those terms. Anendorsement is a part of the policy and also evidences that insurance hasbeen issued as described in the endorsement. The Agency is today making minor revisions to the insurance certificateand endorsement to clarify that other firms may purchase insurance on behalfof owners or operators and to ensure that EPA receives proper notice ofactions affecting the policy, such as attempted cancellation, where thepolicy has been purchased by another firm. These changes are reflectedin paragraphs 2(d) of the ``Hazardous Waste Facility Liability Endorsement''and of the ``Hazardous Waste Facility Certificate of Liability Insurance''in andSection;andSection; 264.151(i) and 264.151(j), respectively.Currently, 40 CFR 264.147(a) and 265.147(a) require that an owner or operatormust ``have and maintain'' coverage for bodily injury and property damageto third parties resulting from operation of a hazardous waste managementfacility. These regulations do not state explicitly that a party otherthan the owner or operator may purchase or obtain the necessary insurancecoverage on behalf of the owner or operator. To clarify in the regulationsthat such insurance may be purchased by a third party, however, requiresonly that the language of the notice of cancellation provision in theseinsurance policies be amended.To ensure that the cancellation provision in the Endorsement and Certificatecovers a situation in which another company has purchased a policy forthe owner or operator, the Agency has modified the language of the cancellationprovision of both the Certificate and Endorsement to state explicitly thatanother firm providing insurance for an owner or operator must notify theRegional Administrator and the owner or operator by certified mail 60 daysbefore insurance is cancelled (40 CFR 264.151(i)(2)(d) and 264.151(j)(2)(d)).In addition, the revised cancellation provision also states that anotherfirm providing insurance for an owner or operator must notify EPA in writing(1) whenever claims are made against the firm or the owner or operatorfor third-party damages and (2) before any changes are made in the policy.The Agency is concerned that reductions in the level of coverage availableto the owner or operator, due to claims made against the firm providingthe insurance or changes in the insurance policy by the firm providingthe insurance, otherwise may not be reported to EPA.F. Allowable Combinations of MechanismsThe Agency will allow an owner or operator to demonstrate the requiredliability coverage through the use of combinations of financial assurancemechanisms (40 CFR 264.147(a)(6), 264.147(b)(6), 265.147(a)(6), and 265.147(b)(6)).Owners or operators may use any combination of insurance, the financialtest, the corporate guarantee, a letter of credit, a surety bond, and atrust fund. In allowing combinations of instruments, EPA is extending thegeneral approach of Subtitle C liability coverage requirements. An owneror operator can use its own financial strength to cover some costs andanother financial assurance mechanism to cover the remainder, providedthat in combining the mechanism assets are not double-counted. To preventdouble-counting, combinations of the corporate guarantee and financialtest are allowed only if the financial statement of the guarantor and theowner or operator are not consolidated (40 CFR 264.147(a)(6), 264.147(b)(6),265.147(a)(6), and 265.147(b)(6)). In a consolidated financial statement,the assets and liabilities of a subsidiary are included in the parent company'sfinancial statement. If the financial statements of the guarantor wereconsolidated with the statement of the owner or operator, the owner oroperator could count its own assets once for the financial test and theycould be counted again in the corporate financial statement which is usedto support the corporate guarantee. Such double-counting of assets wouldnegate the value of the financial test by overestimating the assets ofthe guarantor.Today's rule includes a provision requiring owners and operators to specifywhich of several combined instruments should be drawn upon first in theevent of a claim by designating instruments as ``primary'' or ``excess''coverage. Under closure and post-closure care financial assurance rules,priorities may be established by the Regional Administrator either by selectingone instrument and drawing upon it, or by drawing upon all instrumentssimultaneously and then drawing funds from the standby trust without regardto their source (see 40 CFR 264.143, 264.145, 265.143, and 265.145). TheAgency considered giving the Regional Administrator similar authority intoday's rule. However, the Agency is seeking in this rule to minimize therole of the Regional Administrator in payment of claims. Consequently,under today's rule the Regional Administrator does not establish the orderin which financial assurance mechanisms are drawn upon in cases when ownersor operators use more than one mechanism to satisfy the liability coveragerequirements.The Agency also considered the option of establishing standardized prioritiesfor drawing upon mechanisms. This option was not adopted, however, becausethe Agency believes that priorities can better be established on a case-by-casebasis.While rejecting these two approaches, EPA believes that establishing prioritiesis necessary to avoid delays in the payment of claims and to define clearlythe extent of coverage. For example, priority arrangements are often specifiedwhen insurance is combined with another mechanism. Insurers typically includelanguage within policies limiting their obligations in the event that othercoverage exists and preventing the ``stacking'' of policies except in thecase of designated ``primary'' and ``excess'' coverage. Such language generallyspecifies that the coverage provided is ``primary'' (meaning that it isto be drawn upon first) and that if other coverage exists, payment of claimswill be shared, or that payment will be made after the other coverage isexhausted up to the liability limits of the policy.Today's rule requires an owner or operator to specify which of severalmechanisms that are being used in combination to satisfy the coverage requirementsshould be drawn upon first in the event of a claim. The actual determinationof priority is, however, left with the owner or operator and may involvenegotiation with the providers of the assurance mechanism.To facilitate the establishment of priorities, the financial assuranceinstruments adopted in today's rule include language specifying whetherthe coverage is primary or excess. In addition, the guarantee under andSection;264.151(h)(2) has been amended to indicate whether it provides primaryor excess coverage.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Special Provisions of Additional Mechanisms</ITAG>This section discusses several special provisions that are common to severalof the additional mechanisms for liability coverage authorized by today'srule, and that differ from requirements for closure and post-closure financialassurance.A. BeneficiariesIn contrast to the mechanisms authorized or proposed under Subtitle C forclosure and post-closure care and corrective action, the liability coveragemechanisms authorized today do not name EPA as their beneficiary. In today'srule, the issuer of the mechanism assumes the obligation to satisfy third-partyliability claims for personal injury or property damage arising from operationof the facilities covered by the mechanism if the owner or operator doesnot do so.Third parties, and not EPA, are designated beneficiaries to ensure thatthe third parties are paid directly for liability claims without involvementby EPA. The issuer of the mechanism must honor all valid certified claimsor judgments upon the mechanism up to the limit of the amount covered.B. Payment TriggerTo ensure that only valid claims are paid, the mechanisms specify thatbefore making payment the issuer must receive either (a) a certificateof valid claim signed by the third-party claimants and by the owner oroperator, or (b) a final court judgment. This provision allows for theresolution of third-party claims without the involvement in the disputeof either the issuer of the mechanism or EPA. Each of the mechanisms authorizedtoday contains a provision that incorporates the payment trigger requirements,including the ``certificate of valid claim'' (40 CFR 264.151(h)(2), section13; 264.151(k), clause 2; 264.151(1), condition (4); and 264.151(m), section(4)).The purpose of this payment trigger is to avoid placing either the providerof the mechanism or the Regional Administrator in the position of decidingthe merits of disputes between the owner or operator and the third-partyclaimant. The payment trigger is also set up so that claims do not haveto be litigated for a final judgment. The certification is designed toallow an owner or operator to settle a claim with a third party withoutconceding liability in a document accessible by the public, which couldbe used against the owner or operator in future claims.The requirement to submit the signed and notarized certification assuresthat the parties have either agreed that the claim is valid and in thecorrect amount or they have settled any disputes related to the validityor amount of the claim before coming to the provider for payment. The procedureis designed to reduce administrative burdens and to allow efficient paymentof valid claims. The Agency does not expect the requirement to submit asigned and notarized certification of claim to place undue burdens on ownersor operators or third-party claimants.Alternatively, if the owner or operator and the third-party claimant cannotagree on the validity and amount of the claim, a final judgment by a courtmust be submitted by the third-party claimant, indicating that the claimshould be paid. Whether payment of a judgment shall be made is a matterof applicable State law and shall be determined by the laws of the jurisdictionin which the action was brought.Unlike the requirements for closure and post-closure care and correctiveaction, EPA is not requiring the establishment of a standby trust for mechanismsissued for liability coverage. A standby trust is necessary when fundsare payable to EPA, because by law monies paid to the Federal governmentmust be deposited in the United States Treasury. Because the mechanismswill pay third parties directly, a standby trust is not necessary for liabilitycoverage.C. Certification of Validity and EnforceabilityThe surety bond and guarantee authorized in today's rule may be subjectto the insurance laws and regulations of certain States. To ensure thatthese instruments are valid and enforceable, EPA has contacted severalState insurance commissions to ask how they would view these mechanismsfor liability coverage. The results of those contacts are described inthe docket for this rulemaking.Most of the State commissions contacted said they would probably requirea firm providing a surety bond to qualify as an insurer under State insurancelaws unless the firm was related to the owner or operator in a corporatestructure or it was providing the bond incident to its business relationshipwith the owner or operator. Two factors may influence the State's determination:whether a premium is charged and whether the firm would make such bondsavailable to the general public. To be certain that any bonds used as financialassurance mechanisms will be valid and enforceable, the Agency will notapprove a surety bond for liability coverage unless the Attorneys Generalor Insurance Commissioners of the State in which the surety is incorporated,and of each State in which a facility covered by the bond is located, submitsa written statement that a surety bond written and executed as requiredis a legally valid and enforceable obligation (40 CFR 264.147(i)(4) and265.147(i)(4)). The certification by each State is required only once,and need not be obtained on a case-by-case basis by the owner or operator;instead it is provided to EPA or to a State agency. Accepting certificationsprovided to a State agency may be necessary in some circumstances evenif EPA is administering the financial assurance requirements, because inmany States officials such as the Attorney General will not issue opinionsexcept to State agencies.Guarantees for liability coverage also may come within the jurisdictionof a State's insurance laws and regulations. Accordingly, EPA is requiringthat the guarantee may be used to fulfill liability coverage requirementsonly if the Attorney General or Insurance Commissioner of the State inwhich the guarantor is incorporated, and of each State in which a facilitycovered by the guarantee is located, submits a written statement that aguarantee written and executed as required is a legally valid and enforceableobligation (40 CFR 264.147(g)(2) and 265.147(g)(2)). The corporate guaranteerule provides a parallel requirement for this guarantee. To date, EPA hasreceived evidence from 28 States that the parent guarantee would be acceptable.D. Cancellation Today's rule includes cancellation procedures for the authorized mechanisms.These procedures vary somewhat depending on the instrument. For the suretybond and guarantee provided by an unrelated firm, cancellation is allowed120 days following notification by certified mail to the owner or operatorand to the Regional Administrator(s) of the Region(s) in which the affectedfacilities are located (40 CFR 264.151(h)(2) and 264.151(1)). The Agencybelieves that 120 days is sufficient time for an owner or operator to locatea new financial assurance mechanism, and that any more stringent requirement,such as one requiring an in-place alternative prior to cancellation, wouldlimit the availability of these mechanisms and would require extensiveinvolvement of the Agency in the claims process. The cancellation provisions for guarantees provided by some guarantorsrelated to the owner or operator (i.e., corporate parents, siblings, orgrand parents) require the guarantor to continue to provide the guaranteeuntil an alternate mechanism is in place (40 CFR 264.151(h)(2)). This morestringent requirement is currently required for the corporate parent guaranteeand is today being extended to guarantees provided by some of the otherfirms that are related to the owner or operator. The distinctions in the cancellation provisions are based on the natureof the relationship between the provider of assurance and the owner oroperator. EPA believes that a corporate parent or some of the other relatedcorporations, due to their close relationship with the owner or operator,will have a continuing interest in the financial condition of the owneror operator and therefore should bear more responsibility for continuedfinancial assurance than a less related or completely unrelated firm. Whenguarantees are provided by guarantors closely related to the owner or operator,permitting cancellation only when an alternative has been approved ensuresthat coverage for liability costs will be continuously available. Similarly,because the owner or operator provides a trust fund directly, it is notallowed to cancel that mechanism until another form of financial assurancehas become effective. EPA is not promulgating a similarly stringent cancellationrequirement for providers of insurance, surety bonds, or guarantees byless related and unrelated firms, because it believes that third-partyproviders would not provide coverage if they were unable to cancel thatcoverage, with reasonable notice, at some later date. Today's rule does not amend the current provisions (40 CFR 264.151 (i)and (j)) allowing an insurer to cancel an insurance policy 60 days afterthe notice of cancellation is received by the Regional Administrator. Insuranceproviders argued that not allowing cancellation until at least 120 daysafter notice is given exposes them to considerable risk when the insuredfails to pay the premium for the final period of coverage. In considerationof this concern, the Agency is maintaining the current 60-day requirementfor insurance policies. E. Exclusions The mechanisms in today's rule contain a provision that they do not applyto certain categories of damages or obligations (see 40 CFR 264.151(h)(2),paragraph (4); 264.151(k); 264.151(l), conditions clause (l); and 264.151(m),section 3). These exclusions are patterned on existing standard exclusionsfound in insurance coverage (see, for example, the Insurance Services Officepollution liability coverage form CG 00 39 11 85). They are intended toensure that the coverage is not exhausted by the payment of claims thatare covered by other compensation systems or that are otherwise not intendedto be included within the scope of coverage. The Agency did not adopt all the standard Commercial General Liability(CGL) and Environmental Impairment Liability (EIL) exclusions, but includedonly those exclusions it considered relevant to the financial assurancemechanisms for liability. EPA has also recently issued guidance on theacceptability of site-specific pollution exclusion within insurance policies.This guidance memorandum is applicable only to insurance policies. Exclusion (a), for bodily injury or property damage for which the owneror operator is obligated to pay damages by reason of the assumption ofliability in a contract or agreement, is intended to exclude liabilitiesassumed by contract that do not involve the hazardous waste treatment,storage, and disposal facility or facilities of the owner or operator.It does not exclude settlements or other agreements to pay damages in connectionwith accidental occurrences resulting in bodily injury or property damagecaused by hazardous waste. Exclusion (b), for obligations under workers' compensation, disabilitybenefits, or unemployment compensation law or similar law, is intendedto ensure that liability coverage is available for non-employee third partiesand does not duplicate coverage provided under these other programs orforms of assurance. Exclusion (c), for bodily injury to the employees, or the immediate familyof employees, of the owner or operator, is also intended to ensure thatcoverage is available for ``third parties'' and does not duplicate coverageprovided under other forms of assurance. Exclusion (d), for bodily injury or property damage arising out of theownership or use of any aircraft, motor vehicle, or watercraft, is to preventuse of an authorized financial assurance mechanism for routine accidentsthat are not directly related to management of hazardous waste. Exclusion (e), for property damage to property owned, occupied, rented,or in the care, custody, or control of the owner or operator, is intendedto ensure that coverage will be available to compensate third parties,and not the owner or operator, for property damage as a result of activitiesat TSDFs. <ITAG tagnum="85">V. Other Issues Presented in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking </ITAG>In the August 21, 1985, NPRM, EPA suggested several additional approachesthat could be taken to promote compliance with the financial responsibilityrequirements. Alternatives, other than authorizing additional financialassurance mechanisms, included the suspension or withdrawal of the liabilitycoverage requirements, clarification of the scope of coverage, revisionof the required levels of coverage, or authorization of waivers. Numerouscomments were received on these alternatives. After considering these comments,the Agency has decided to retain the liability coverage requirements attheir present levels, to maintain the present scope of coverage, and toreject the option of generic waivers. This section discusses briefly thecomments received on these alternatives in response to the NPRM and explainsthe reasons why EPA is not adopting them. A more complete discussion ofthese comments is included within the docket accompanying today's rule.A. Maintain, Suspend, or Withdraw Existing Liability Coverage RequirementsThe Agency received comments from State governments and the public thatgenerally argued in favor of maintaining the requirements. Supporters ofthe existing requirements argued that the insurance market for EIL coveragewould not recover without such requirements; that maintaining the requirementwould increase public confidence in hazardous waste facilities and decreaseopposition to siting and permitting such facilities; and that low-riskowners and operators were able to obtain coverage. Commenters from Stateand local governments in particular argued that suspension or withdrawalof the liability coverage requirements would severely damage the chancesfor an eventual solution to the problem of insurance availability, thatsuspension would not be acceptable to the public and would undermine thestrength of programs to regulate hazardous waste management, and that liabilitycoverage is necessary to protect human health and environment. Facilitiesthat are unable to obtain such coverage, in these commenters' opinion shouldnot continue in operation. In contrast, a number of firms in the regulated community argued that EPAshould not maintain the existing liability coverage requirements, but rathershould suspend or withdraw the requirements, because of the difficultymany firms faced in obtaining insurance. Commenters also argued that theliability coverage requirements could be suspended or withdrawn becausethey were redundant with permitting conditions and that EPA should concentrateon achieving risk control rather than post-loss compensation. They alsopointed out that even if the liability coverage requirements were abolished,third parties harmed by hazardous waste management activities could stillsue the owner or operator for damages. Finally, commenters argued thatthe constraints on insurance availability made a short-term suspensionnecessary, even if the requirements for liability coverage were later reinstituted.After considering these comments and suggestions made in response to otherquestions in the NPRM, EPA has concluded that the current liability coveragerequirements should be maintained. The Agency believes that the requirementsare an important component of the RCRA management system and are necessaryto protect human health and the environment. Further, Congress in the Hazardousand Solid Waste Amendments of 1984 (HSWA) has stressed the importance ofsatisfying all financial assurance requirements, including liability coverage.Finally, by authorizing the use of additional financial mechanisms forliability coverage, the Agency believes that the problems of insuranceavailability cited by some commenters as reasons to suspend or withdrawthe rule should become less important in the future. B. Revise Scope and Levels of Coverage A number of issues were considered by EPA in connection with the scopeand levels of coverage. They included coverage levels, distinction betweensudden and nonsudden coverage, exclusion of legal defense costs, and deductibles.Each is discussed in this section. 1.<T3> Coverage Levels</T3>. EPA established the sudden accidental and nonsuddenaccidental liability coverage requirements in 1982 at $1 million per occurrenceand $3 million per occurrence, respectively, on the basis of the Agency'sinvestigation of existing third-party damage cases. To account for thepossibility that the same firm might experience more than one claim ina year, the Agency also established annual aggregate coverage requirementsat twice those amounts, or $2 million and $6 million, respectively. In July 1986, EPA again reviewed third-party damage claims, awards, andsettlements for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences involving hazardouschemicals as well as hazardous waste to determine whether the requiredlevels of coverage are adequate. Data were limited, however, for severalreasons, including the fact that few cases have been litigated to completion.Thus, available data were generally data on amounts claimed, rather thanamounts recovered in awards or settlements. Because final awards and settlementsoften differ significantly from initial claims, it is difficult to drawconclusions based on this data. In addition, commenters did not supplyany additional information indicating that the currently required coveragelevels should be changed. The Agency concluded, in light of the limiteddata, that it had insufficient basis to change the requirements at thistime. 2.<T3> Distinction Between Sudden and Nonsudden Coverage</T3>. 40 CFR 264.147(a)and 265.147(a) require all owners or operators of hazardous waste facilitiesto have ``sudden accidental'' coverage. Owners and operators of surfaceimpoundments, landfills, or land treatment facilities used to manage hazardouswastes also are required to have ``nonsudden accidental'' coverage (40CFR 264.147(b) and 265.147(b)). A number of commenters on the August 21, 1985, NPRM suggested that theAgency no longer distinguish between sudden and nonsudden accidental coverage.They argued that nonsudden coverage was difficult to obtain, and that insurerswere beginning to issue combined policies for sudden and nonsudden coverage.(A more complete discussion of comments on this point is provided in documentsaccompanying today's rulemaking.) EPA has decided to maintain the distinction between sudden and nonsuddencoverage. The Agency believes that maintaining distinct coverage requirementsis still appropriate. Further, the insurance industry continues to writepolicies that distinguish between sudden and nonsudden events. EPA recognizes,however, that in some cases, courts have interpreted coverage for suddenevents broadly to include damage from a gradual release occurring overlong periods of time. As a result, some insurers do not distinguish betweensudden and nonsudden events, but offer ``combined coverage'': coveragefor both sudden and nonsudden events on the same policy with single aggregateand per-occurrence limits. Today's rule includes a change to the coveragerequirements citation specifying that the Agency will accept ``combinedcoverage'' policies, but to provide equivalent levels of coverage, thelimits must be at least $4 million per-occurrence ($1 million sudden plus$3 million nonsudden) and $8 million annual aggregate ($2 million suddenplus $6 million nonsudden).3. <T3>Exclusion of Legal Defense Costs from Policy Limits. </T3>Currently,Subpart H requires an owner or operator of a TSDF to maintain liabilitycoverage for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences at specified levels,exclusive of legal defense costs (40 CFR 264.147 (a) and (b) and 265.147(a) and (b)). The Agency decided to exclude legal defense costs for tworeasons: (1) The insurance industry standard for CGL policies excludedlegal defense costs from the coverage, and (2) legal defense costs couldabsorb a major portion of the required coverage, leaving an inadequateamount to cover actual damages. The Agency continues to believe that thesereasons remain valid and do not affect the availability of insurance. In its August 21, 1985 NPRM the Agency requested comment on whether, inan effort to increase the availability of EIL coverage for TSDFs, legaldefense costs should be included in coverage limits. A number of commenterssupported including legal defense costs. They argued that the EIL coveragecurrently available to TSDFs is written to include defense costs withinpolicy limits. The Agency contacted insurance companies known to provideEIL coverage to ask whether their EIL policies included or excluded legaldefense costs. Although some companies stated that defense costs are includedin the coverage limits, others said that defense costs were excluded, orthat the policy could be written to conform to the RCRA requirements; thatis, policies could be written to exclude legal defense costs. Furthermore,current industry practice, including the present industry standard formfor this type of insurance, still excludes defense costs from the coveragelimits. In addition, while recently there have been attempts by insurersto limit defense cost exposure by including at least some defense costswithin policy limits, the trend appears to be toward some other methodof limiting costs outside of policy limits. The second reason commenters presented for changing the RCRA requirementsto include legal defense costs was that the assurance of the availabilityof defense costs is an important element of claims litigation and furtherthat there were insufficient RCRA claims data to warrant requiring coverageexcluding legal defense costs. The Agency continues to believe that it is important for the full amountof liability coverage to be available to cover claims against owners oroperators of TSDFs. The Agency decided on the current coverage levels aftera thorough investigation of reported third-party damage cases from hazardouswaste accidents and these levels do not account for legal defense costs.Because the size of legal defense costs in this area is somewhat uncertain,the most secure method of ensuring that sufficient funds will be availableto cover actual damages is to retain the requirement that defense costsbe excluded. Other commenters stated that including legal defense costs should be permissible,as long as the full amount of RCRA liability coverage was available toclaimants. EPA agrees. If the total coverage includes the full amount requiredfor third-party liability plus additional coverage earmarked for legaldefense costs, the policy would be acceptable under current regulations.Thus, for example, a policy would provide acceptable assurance for a surfaceimpoundment if the total coverage was $5 million per occurrence and $10million annual aggregate if legal defense costs covered under the policywere limited to a maximum of $1 million per occurrence and $2 million annualaggregate. A $5 million per occurrence, $8 million annual aggregate policywithout an earmarked limit on legal defense costs would not provide adequateassurance. 4. <T3>Deductibles. </T3>A number of commenters argued that EPA should notrequire ``first-dollar'' coverage for liability costs. If deductibles wereallowed, according to these commenters, insurance coverage might be easierto obtain or be less costly. Although the insurer must provide first-dollar coverage, EPA notes thatthe regulations do not prevent insurers from requiring reimbursement fromowners or operators for first-dollar expenditures. The owner or operatorcan agree in the insurance contract that the insurer will be reimbursedfor these expenditures. The regulations do not, however, allow self-insuranceretention. Policies cannot require the owner or operator to cover first-dollarexpenditures. Such self-insurance is available to an owner or operatorunder the regulations only if it can pass the requirements establishedin the financial test for liability coverage. EPA contacted a number of insurers to determine whether self-insuranceretention could help to alleviate problems of insurance availability andaffordability. In general, however, their responses indicated that currentproblems with EIL insurance are related to other factors, such as difficultyin predicting the size of the risk being covered, and that deductibleswould not significantly enhance insurance availability. Therefore, theAgency is retaining the current first-dollar coverage requirement. C. Mechanisms Considered But Not Adopted 1. <T3>Security interests. </T3>Security interests are a special procedure,authorized under State law following a pattern established by the UniformCommercial Code, for creating collateral to serve as a support for therepayment of loans or other financial obligations. Security interests wereconsidered but rejected for liability coverage because of the complicatedlegal requirements that have to be satisfied to ensure that they provideeffective financial assurance. For example, security interests ordinarilymust be perfected by filing papers with appropriate agencies in each jurisdictionwhere collateral exists, and these filings must be kept up to date. EPAwould be required to verify that proper filings had occurred. In addition,the Agency would also have to determine that the collateral underlyingthe agreement had been valued properly. If not, the proceeds from saleof the collateral might fail to supply the amounts required to satisfyvalid claims. Finally, the need to satisfy specific legal processes priorto liquidation of collateral could delay payment of valid third-party claims.Because of these problems, EPA has decided not to adopt security interestsat this time. 2. <T3>Indemnity contracts. </T3>Indemnity contracts are legally binding commitmentsby a third party or ``indemnitor'' to pay a debt or obligation of anotherparty. The duty of the indemnitor generally is to repay the primary debtorafter it has satisfied the debt or obligation. The Agency was not willingto adopt such a mechanism because of the administrative difficulties andlengthy time needed to enforce such contracts. An indemnity contract also may be established in which the indemnitor agreesto assume the obligation even if the primary debtor does not pay. Sucha contract, however, so closely resembles a guarantee that EPA determinedthat in effect no additional financial assurance option would be addedto the regulations by inclusion of the indemnity. Therefore the Agencyhas not added an indemnity contract to the set of options authorized intoday's rule. 3. <T3>Reserve funds. </T3>As a temporary measure pending the growth of theinsurance market, some commenters suggested that owners or operators setaside the equivalent of insurance premiums in a reserve fund. Such a mechanismcould function in a manner similar to trusts, if control over the fundwere given to an independent fiduciary agent. Alternatively, however, somecommenters suggested that the reserve fund be only a separate bookkeepingentity under the control of the owner or operator. EPA believes that neitherapproach would ensure that the reserve would contain sufficient funds whenrequired to satisfy claims. Liability coverage funds may be needed at anytime after implementation of the mechanism. Because a reserve fund basedon the estimated equivalent of insurance premiums, rather than the amountsequal to the required coverage levels, would accumulate slowly, it wouldbe unlikely to contain adequate funds to satisfy liability claims, especiallyin the early years. In addition, EPA is convinced that a reserve fund that is not under thecontrol of an independent trustee but instead remains under the controlof the TSDF owner or operator will not provide satisfactory financial assurance.No independent third party would administer the reserve fund, includingassessing its value and controlling payments from the fund. The Agencydetermined, therefore, not to authorize the use of reserves. Today's ruleauthorizes a fully funded trust fund, for owners and operators who wantto use a similar mechanism. 4. <T3>Federal Insurance or Loan Guarantees. </T3>Some commenters pointedto other financial assurance programs utilizing Federal insurance or loanguarantees as possible models for EPA. Establishment of insurance or loanguarantees requires specific statutory authority that has not been grantedto the Agency. Further, EPA does not believe that as an agency whose primarymandate is protection of human health and the environment, it currentlypossesses the expertise or resources to administer either an insuranceor a loan guarantee program. Such programs or approaches would requirethe Agency to assess financial characteristics of owners or operators,and to make decisions concerning the validity of claims, when those assessmentsand decisions can be made more accurately and efficiently by existing institutionsthat provide financial assurance. 5. <T3>Captive Insurance Pools and Risk Retention Groups. </T3>EPA believesit is unnecessary in today's rulemaking explicitly to authorize the useof captive insurance pools and risk retention groups. Such instrumentsare already authorized as forms of insurance. If the policies offered bya pool or risk retention group satisfy EPA requirements, such policiesprovide acceptable financial assurance. D. Authorize Waivers A number of commenters, particularly those from industry, supported grantingtemporary waivers on a case-by-case basis if a firm can demonstrate thatit has made a ``good faith effort'' to obtain the required liability insurance.However, the Agency believes that the authorization of additional mechanisms,existing enforcement policies, the somewhat improved insurance market forTSDFs and the increased potential of insurance offered by risk retentiongroups, provide a better solution than simply waiving the liability coveragerequirements. Also, existing regulations enable Regional Administratorsto grant variances (andSection;andSection;264.147(c) and 265.147(c)) or adjustments(andSection;264.147(d) and 265.147(d)) to the required liability coverageamounts, if this is justified by the degree and duration of risk associatedwith a TSDF. The Agency believes that justifiable modifications in theamount of coverage needed are more consistent with the objectives of theliability coverage requirements than would be relieving owners or operatorsof these requirements entirely, solely because they made a ``good faith''effort to obtain coverage. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Consistency With Other Existing and Proposed Financial AssuranceRequirements  </ITAG>EPA currently allows owners or operators of hazardous waste TSDFs to usethe mechanisms being approved in today's rule, including trust funds, lettersof credit, surety bonds, and corporate guarantee contracts, to providefinancial assurance for the costs of closure and post-closure care (40CFR 264.143, 264.145, 264.151, 265.143, and 265.145), and has proposedtheir use for corrective action (51 FR 37854, October 24, 1986). As describedabove, certain features of the assurance mechanisms are different becauseof the differences between these programs and liability coverage.  In addition, EPA has proposed financial assurance rules applicable to ownersand operators of underground storage tanks (USTs) containing petroleumunder sections 9003 (c) and (d) of RCRA as amended by HSWA (RCRA SubtitleI), and by the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 (SARA)(52 FR 12662, April 17, 1987). The proposed rule would establish requirementsfor demonstrating financial responsibility for taking corrective actionand compensating third parties for bodily injury and property damage causedby sudden and nonsudden accidental releases arising from operating an undergroundstorage tank containing petroleum. As in today's rule, under the UST proposal,owners and operators of underground storage tanks containing petroleumwould be allowed to use letters of credit, surety bonds, and expanded guaranteesto demonstrate financal responsibility for the costs of corrective actionand third-party liability claims (52 FR 12786, 12844, April 17, 1987).<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Technical Correction to 40 CFR 264.151(b)  </ITAG>The May 2, 1986 rule amending the closure, post-closure care, and financialassurance regulations mistakenly omitted a portion of the required languagefor the financial guarantee bond found in 40 CFR 264.151(b) (see 51 FR16422, 16450). Today's rule makes a technical correction to the regulationto restore the required wording of the bond. <ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Effective Date  </ITAG>This regulation is being published as a final rule, effective in 30 days. Section 3010(b) of RCRA provides that EPA's hazardous waste regulationsand revisions thereto generally take effect six months after their promulgations.The purpose of this requirement is to allow sufficient time for the regulatedcommunity to comply with major new regulatory requirements. The statuteallows for a shorter period prior to the effective date, if (i) the Administratorfinds that the regulated community does not need six months to come intocompliance; (ii) the regulation responds to an emergency situation, or(iii) other good cause. The Agency believes that since the regulation doesnot add any compliance requirements, but rather expands the number of mechanismsowners or operators may use to come into compliance, a six-month periodprior to the effective date is unnecessary.  Today's amendment adopts additional mechanisms for complying with third-partliability coverage requirements and thus makes it easier for some ownersand operators to act in accordance with the RCRA liability coverage regulations.An effective date six months after promulgation for the amendment promulgatedtoday would substantially delay the implementation of the regulations andwould be contrary to the interest of the regulated community and the public.Accordingly, the Agency believes that it makes little sense to delay neededrelief to owners or operators by an additional five months. <ITAG tagnum="84">IX. State Authority </ITAG>A. Applicability of Rules in Authorized States  Under section 3006 of RCRA, EPA may authorize qualified States to administerand enforce the RCRA program within the State. (See 40 CFR Part 271 forthe standards and requirements for authorization.) Following authorization,EPA retains enforcement authority under RCRA sections 3008, 7003, and 3013,although authorized States have primary enforcement responsibility.  Prior to HSWA, a State with final authorization administered its hazardouswaste program entirely in lieu of EPA administering the Federal programin that State. The Federal requirements no longer applied in the authorizedState, and EPA could not issue permits for any facilities in a State wherethe State was authorized to permit. When new, more stringent Federal requirementswere promulgated or enacted, the State was obligated to enact equivalentauthority within specified time frames. New Federal requirements did nottake effect in an authorized State until the State adopted the requirementsas State law.  In contrast, under section 3006(g) of RCRA, 42 U.S.C. 6926(g), new requirementsand prohibitions imposed by the HSWA take effect in authorized States atthe same time that they take effect in non-authorized States. EPA is directedto carry out those requirements and prohibitions in authorized States,including the issuance of permits, until the State is granted authorizationto do so. While States must still adopt HSWA-related provisions as Statelaw to retain final authorization, the HSWA requirements and prohibitionsapply in authorized States in the interim. B. Effect of Rule on State Authorizations  Today's rule promulgates standards that will not be effective in authorizedStates since the requirements are not being imposed pursuant to HSWA. Thus,the requirements will be applicable only in those States that do not haveinterim or final authorization. In authorized States, the requirementswill not be applicable until the State revises its program to adopt equivalentrequirements under State law.  In general, 40 CFR 271.21(e)(2) requires that States that have final authorizationto modify their programs to reflect Federal program changes and subsequentlysubmit the modifications to EPA for approval. It should be noted, however,that authorized States are only required to modify their programs whenEPA promulgates Federal standards that are more stringent or broader inscope than the existing Federal standards. Section 3009 of RCRA allowsStates to impose standards more stringent than those in the Federal program.For those Federal program changes that are less stringent or reduce thescope of the Federal program, States are not required to modify their programs(see 40 CFR 271.1(i)). The standards promulgated today are less stringentthan or reduce the scope of the existing Federal requirements. Therefore,authorized States will not be required to modify their programs to adoptrequirements equivalent or substantially equivalent to the provisions listedabove. If the State does modify its program, EPA must approve the modificationfor the State requirements to become Subtitle C RCRA requirements. Statesshould follow the deadlines of 40 CFR 271.21(e)(2) if they desire to adoptthis less stringent requirement.<ITAG tagnum="84">X. Executive Order 12291  </ITAG>Under Executive Order 12291 (section 3(b)) the Agency must judge whethera regulation is major and thus subject to the requirement of a RegulatoryImpact Analysis. The notice published today is not major because the rulewill not result in an effect on the economy of $100 million or more, willnot result in increased costs or prices, will not have significant adverseeffects on competition, employment, investment, productivity, and innovation,and will not significantly disrupt domestic or export markets. Therefore,the Agency has not prepared a Regulatory Impact Analysis under the ExecutiveOrder.  This regulation was submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB)for review as required by Exective Order No. 12291. <ITAG tagnum="84">XI. Regulatory Flexibility Act   </ITAG>Under the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>), Federal agencies must, in developing regulations, analyzetheir impact on small entities (small businesses, small government jurisdictions,and small organizations). This rule relaxes the existing financial assurancerequirements and thus reduces costs associated with compliance. Accordingly,I certify that this regulation will not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. <ITAG tagnum="84">XII. Supporting Documents  </ITAG>Supporting documents available for this interim final rule include commentson the August 21, 1985 Proposed Rule, summary of the comments on the July11, 1986 Interim Final Rule, and background documents on the finanicaltest for liability coverage. In addition, background documents preparedfor previous financial assurance regulations, as well as documents preparedfor this rulemaking, are also available as are letters received from StateAttorneys General concerning the corporate guarantee for liability.  All of these supporting materials are available for review in the EPA publicdocket (RCRA docket andplusmin;F-88-CGF1-FFFFF), Room S-212, Waterside Mall,401 M Street, SW., Washington, DC 20460. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>40 CFR Part 264  Hazardous waste, Insurance, Packaging and containers, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Surety bonds. 40 CFR Part 265  Hazardous waste, Insurance, Packaging and containers, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Surety bonds.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: August 19, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator. </ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, Title 40, Chapter I of the Codeof Federal Regulations is amended as set forth below.   40 CFR Part 264 is amended as follows:   <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 264_STANDARDS FOR OWNERS AND OPERATORS OF HAZARDOUS WASTE TREATMENT,STORAGE, AND DISPOSAL FACILITIES: LIABILITY COVERAGE   </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 264 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 6905, 6912(a), 6924, and 6925. </ITAG>2. In andSection;264.141, new paragraph (h) is added to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;264.141 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions of terms as used in this subpart.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *   </ITAG>(h) ``Substantial business relationship'' means the extent of a businessrelationship necessary under applicable State law to make a guarantee contractissued incident to that relationship valid and enforceable. A ``substantialbusiness relationship'' must arise from a pattern of recent or ongoingbusiness transactions, in addition to the guarantee itself, such that acurrently existing business relationship between the guarantor and theowner or operator is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the applicableEPA Regional Administrator.   3. In andSection;264.147, paragraph (h) is redesignated as paragraph (k);paragraphs (a) introductory text, (a)(2), (a)(3), (b) introductory text,(b)(2), (b)(3), (b)(4), (g) heading and (g)(1) introductory text are revised,and by removing and reserving paragraph (g)(1)(ii); paragraphs (g)(2)(i)and (g)(2)(ii) are amended by removing ``corporate;'' and new paragraphs(a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), (b)(5), (b)(6), (b)(7), (h), (i), and (j)are added, to read as follows:   <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;264.147 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Liability requirements.   </ITAG>(a) <T3>Coverage for sudden accidental occurrences. </T3>An owner or operatorof a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility, or a groupof such facilities, must demonstrate financial responsibility for bodilyinjury and property damage to third parties caused by sudden accidentaloccurrences arising from operations of the facility or group of facilities.The owner or operator must have and maintain liability coverage for suddenaccidental occurrences in the amount of at least $1 million per occurrencewith an annual aggregate of at least $2 million, exclusive of legal defensecosts. This liability coverage may be demonstrated as specified in paragraphs(a) (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section:   <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *   </ITAG>(2) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by passinga financial test or using the guarantee for liability coverage as specifiedin paragraph (g) of this section.   (3) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga letter of credit for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (h)of this section.   (4) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga surety bond for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (i) of thissection.   (5) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga trust fund for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (j) of thissection.   (6) An owner or operator may demonstrate the required liability coveragethrough the use of combinations of insurance, financial test, guarantee,letter of credit, surety bond, and trust fund, except that the owner oroperator may not combine a financial test covering part of the liabilitycoverage requirement with a guarantee unless the financial statement ofthe owner or operator is not consolidated with the financial statementof the guarantor. The amounts of coverage demonstrated must total at leastthe minimum amounts required by this section. If the owner or operatordemonstrates the required coverage through the use of a combination offinancial assurances under this paragraph, the owner or operator shallspecify at least one such assurance as ``primary'' coverage and shall specifyother assurance as ``excess'' coverage.    (7) An owner or operator shall notify the Regional Administrator in writingwithin 30 days (i) whenever a claim for bodily injury or property damagescaused by the operation of a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposalfacility is made against the owner or operator or an instrument providingfinancial assurance for liability coverage under this section and (ii)whenever the amount of financial assurance for liability coverage underthis section provided by a financial instrument authorized by paragraphs(a)(1) through (a)(6) of this section is reduced.   (b) <T3>Coverage for nonsudden accidental occurrences. </T3>An owner or operatorof a surface impoundment, landfill, or land treatment facility which isused to manage hazardous waste, or a group of such facilities, must demonstratefinancial responsibility for bodily injury and property damage to thirdparties caused by nonsudden accidental occurrences arising from operationsof the facility or group of facilities. The owner or operator must haveand maintain liability coverage for nonsudden accidental occurrences inthe amount of at least $3 million per occurrence with an annual aggregateof at least $6 million, exclusive of legal defense costs. An owner or operatorwho must meet the requirements of this section may combine the requiredper-occurrence coverage levels for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrencesinto a single per-occurrence level, and combine the required annual aggregatecoverage levels for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences into asingle annual aggregate level. Owners or operators who combine coveragelevels for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences must maintain liabilitycoverage in the amount of at least $4 million per occurrence and $8 millionannual aggregate. This liability coverage may be demonstrated as specifiedin paragraphs (b) (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6), of this section:   <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *   </ITAG>(2) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by passinga financial test or using the guarantee for liability coverage as specifiedin paragraphs (f) and (g) of this section.    (3) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga letter of credit for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (h)of this section.   (4) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga surety bond for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (i) of thissection.  (5) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga trust fund for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (j) of thissection.(6) An owner or operator may demonstrate the required liability coveragethrough the use of combinations of insurance, financial test, guarantee,letter of credit, surety bond, and trust fund, except that the owner oroperator may not combine a financial test covering part of the liabilitycoverage requirement with a guarantee unless the financial statement ofthe owner or operator is not consolidated with the financial statementof the guarantor. The amounts of coverage demonstrated must total at leastthe minimum amount required by this section. If the owner or operator demonstratesthe required coverage through the use of a combination of financial assurancesunder this paragraph, the owner or operator shall specify at least onesuch assurance as ``primary'' coverage and shall specify other assuranceas ``excess'' coverage.(7) An owner or operator shall notify the Regional Administrator in writingwithin 30 days (i) whenever a claim for bodily injury or property damagescaused by the operation of a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposalfacility is made against the owner or operator or an instrument providingfinancial assurance for liability coverage under this section and (ii)whenever the amount of financial assurance for liability coverage underthis section provided by a financial instrument authorized by paragraphs(a)(1) through (a)(6) of this section is reduced.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g)<T3> Guarantee for liability coverage. </T3>(1) Subject to paragraph (g)(2)of this section, an owner or operator may meet the requirements of thissection by obtaining a written guarantee, hereinafter referred to as ``guarantee.''The guarantor must be the direct or higher-tier parent corporation of theowner or operator, a firm whose parent corporation is also the parent corporationof the owner or operator, or a firm with a ``substantial business relationship''with the owner or operator. The guarantor must meet the requirements forowners or operators in paragraphs (f)(1) through (f)(6) of this section.The wording of the guarantee must be identical to the wording specifiedin andSection; 264.151(h)(2) of this part. A certified copy of the guaranteemust accompany the items sent to the Regional Administrator as specifiedin paragraph (f)(3) of this section. One of these items must be the letterfrom the guarantor's chief financial officer. If the guarantor's parentcorporation is also the parent corporation of the owner or operator, thisletter must describe the value received in consideration of the guarantee.If the guarantor is a firm with a ``substantial business relationship''with the owner or operator, this letter must describe this ``substantialbusiness relationship'' and the value received in consideration of theguarantee.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(h) <T3>Letter of credit for liability coverage. </T3>(1) An owner or operatormay satisfy the requirements of this section by obtaining an irrevocablestandby letter or credit that conforms to the requirements of this paragraphand submitting a copy of the letter of credit to the Regional Administrator.(2) The financial institution issuing the letter of credit must be an entitythat has the authority to issue letters of credit and whose letter of creditoperations are regulated and examined by a Federal or State agency.(3) The wording of the letter of credit must be identical to the wordingspecified in andSection; 264.151(k) of this part.(i) <T3>Surety bond for liability coverage.</T3> (1) An owner or operator maysatisfy the requirements of this section by obtaining a surety bond thatconforms to the requirements of this paragraph and submitting a copy ofthe bond to the Regional Administrator.(2) The surety company issuing the bond must be among those listed as acceptablesureties on Federal bonds in the most recent Circular 570 of the U.S. Departmentof the Treasury.(3) The wording of the surety bond must be identical to the wording specifiedin andSection; 264.151(1) of this part.(4) A surety bond may be used to satisfy the requirements of this sectiononly if the Attorneys General or Insurance Commissioners of (i) the Statein which the surety is incorporated, and (ii) each State in which a facilitycovered by the surety bond is located have submitted a written statementto EPA that a surety bond executed as described in this section and andSection;264.151(1) of this part is a legally valid and enforceable obligation inthat State.(j) <T3>Trust fund for liability coverage.</T3> (1) An owner or operator maysatisfy the requirements of this section by establishing a trust fund thatconforms to the requirements of this paragraph and submitting an originallysigned duplicate of the trust agreement to the Regional Administrator.(2) The trustee must be an entity which has the authority to act as a trusteeand whose trust operations are regulated and examined by a Federal or Stateagency.(3) The trust fund for liability coverage must be funded for the full amountof the liability coverage to be provided by the trust fund before it maybe relied upon to satisfy the requirements of this section. If at any timeafter the trust fund is created the amount of funds in the trust fund isreduced below the full amount of the liability coverage to be provided,the owner or operator, by the anniversary date of the establishment ofthe fund, must either add sufficient funds to the trust fund to cause itsvalue to equal the full amount of liability coverage to be provided, orobtain other financial assurance as specified in this section to coverthe difference. For purposes of this paragraph, ``the full amount of theliability coverage to be provided'' means the amount of coverage for suddenand/or nonsudden occurrences required to be provided by the owner or operatorby this section, less the amount of financial assurance for liability coveragethat is being provided by other financial assurance mechanisms being usedto demonstrate financial assurance by the owner or operator.(4) The wording of the trust fund must be identical to the wording specifiedin andSection; 264.151(m) of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 264.151 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>4. In andSection; 264.151 paragraph (b) is amended by adding the followingtext to the end of the ``Financial Guarantee Bond'' to read as follows:(b) * * *<ITAG tagnum="74">Financial Guarantee Bond</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Or, if the Principal shall provide alternate financial assurance,as specified in Subpart H of 40 CFR Part 264 or 265, as applicable, andobtain the EPA Regional Administrator's written approval of such assurance,within 90 days after the date notice of cancellation is received by boththe Principal and the EPA Regional Administrator(s) from the Surety(ies),then this obligation shall be null and void; otherwise it is to remainin full force and effect.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Surety(ies) shall become liable on this bond obligation only whenthe Principal has failed to fulfill the conditions described above. Uponnotification by an EPA Regional Administrator that the Principal has failedto perform as guaranteed by this bond, the Surety(ies) shall place fundsin the amount guaranteed for the facility(ies) into the standby trust fundas directed by the EPA Regional Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The liability of the Surety(ies) shall not be discharged by any paymentor succession of payments hereunder, unless and until such payment or paymentsshall amount in the aggregate to the penal sum of the bond, but in no eventshall the obligation of the Surety(ies) hereunder exceed the amount ofsaid penal sum.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Surety(ies) may cancel the bond by sending notice of cancellationby certified mail to the Principal and to the EPA Regional Administrator(s)for the Region(s) in which the facility(ies) is (are) located, provided,however, that cancellation shall not occur during the 120 days beginningon the date of receipt of the notice of cancellation by both the Principaland the EPA Regional Administrator(s), as evidenced by the return receipts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Principal may terminate this bond by sending written notice tothe Surety(ies), provided, however, that no such notice shall become effectiveuntil the Surety(ies) receive(s) written authorization for terminationof the bond by the EPA Regional Administrator(s) of the EPA Region(s) inwhich the bonded facility(ies) is (are) located.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">[The following paragraph is an optional rider that may be includedbut is not required.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Principal and Surety(ies) hereby agree to adjust the penal sum ofthe bond yearly so that it guarantees a new closure and/or post-closureamount, provided that the penal sum does not increase by more than 20 percentin any one year, and no decrease in the penal sum takes place without thewritten permission of the EPA Regional Administrator(s).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In Witness Whereof, the Principal and Surety(ies) have executed thisFinancial Guarantee Bond and have affixed their seals on the date set forthabove.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The persons whose signatures appear below hereby certify that theyare authorized to execute this surety bond on behalf of the Principal andSurety(ies) and that the wording of this surety bond is identical to thewording specified in 40 CFR 264.151(b) as such regulations were constitutedon the date this bond was executed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Principal</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">[Signature(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">[Name(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">[Title(s)] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">[Corporate seal]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Corporate Surety(ies)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Name and address]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">State of incorporation:]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Liability limit: $</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signature(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Name(s) and title(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Corporate seal]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[For every co-surety, provide signature(s), corporate seal, and otherinformation in the same manner as for Surety above.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Bond premium: $</ITAG>5. In andSection; 264.151, paragraph (g) is revised to read as follows:(g) A letter from the chief financial officer, as specified in andSection;264.147(f) or andSection; 265.147(f) of this chapter, must be worded as follows,except that instructions in brackets are to be replaced with the relevantinformation and the brackets deleted.<ITAG tagnum="74">Letter From Chief Financial Officer</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">[Address to Regional Administrator of every Region in which facilitiesfor which financial responsibility is to be demonstrated through the financialtest are located.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I am the chief financial officer of [firm's name and address]. Thisletter is in support of the use of the financial test to demonstrate financialresponsibility for liability coverage [insert ``and closure and/or post-closurecare'' if applicable] as specified in Subpart H of 40 CFR Parts 264 and265. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">[Fill out the following paragraphs regarding facilities and liabilitycoverage. If there are no facilities that belong in a particular paragraph,write ``None'' in the space indicated. For each facility, include its EPAIdentification Number, name, and address.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The firm identified above is the owner or operator of the followingfacilities for which liability coverage for [insert ``sudden'' or ``nonsudden''or ``both sudden and nonsudden''] accidental occurrences is being demonstratedthrough the financial test specified in Subpart H of 40 CFR Parts 264 and265: <T2>XXXX</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The firm identified above guarantees, through the guarantee specifiedin Subpart H or 40 CFR Parts 264 and 265, liability coverage for [insert``sudden'' or ``nonsudden'' or ``both sudden and nonsudden''] accidentaloccurrences at the following facilities owned or operated by the following:<T2>XXXX</T2>. The firm identified above is [insert one or more: (1) Thedirect or higher-tier parent corporation of the owner or operator; (2)owned by the same parent corporation as the parent corporation of the owneror operator, and receiving the following value in consideration of thisguarantee <T2>XXXX</T2>; or (3) engaged in the following substantial business relationshipwith the owner or operator <T2>XXXX</T2>, and receiving the following value in consideration of thisguarantee <T2>XXXX</T2>.] [Attach a written description of the business relationshipor a copy of the contract establishing such relationship to this letter.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">[If you are using the financial test to demonstrate coverage of bothliability and closure and post-closure care, fill in the following fourparagraphs regarding facilities and associated closure and post-closurecost estimates. If there are no facilities that belong in a particularparagraph, write ``None'' in the space indicated. For each facility, includeits EPA Identification Number, name, address, and current closure and/orpost-closure cost estimates. Identify each cost estimate as to whetherit is for closure or post-closure care.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The firm identified above owns or operates the following facilitiesfor which financial assurance for closure or post-closure care or liabilitycoverage is demonstrated through the financial test specified in SubpartH of 40 CFR Parts 264 and 265. The current closure and/or post-closurecost estimate covered by the test are shown for each facility: <T2>XXXX</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The firm identified above guarantees, through the guarantee specifiedin Subpart H of 40 CFR Parts 264 and 265, the closure and post-closurecare or liability coverage of the following facilities owned or operatedby the guaranteed party. The current cost estimates for the closure orpost-closure care so guaranteed are shown for each facility: <T2>XXXX</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. In States where EPA is not administering the financial requirementsof Subpart H of 40 CFR Parts 264 and 265, this firm is demonstrating financialassurance for the closure or post-closure care of the following facilitiesthrough the use of a test equivalent or substantially equivalent to thefinancial test specified in Subpart H of 40 CFR Parts 264 and 265. Thecurrent closure or post-closure cost estimates covered by such a test areshown for each facility: <T2>XXXX</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The firm identified above owns or operates the following hazardouswaste management facilities for which financial assurance for closure or,if a disposal facility, post-closure care, is not demonstrated either toEPA or a State through the financial test or any other financial assurancemechanisms specified in Subpart H of 40 CFR Parts 264 and 265 or equivalentor substantially equivalent State mechanisms. The current closure and/orpost-closure cost estimates not covered by such financial assurance areshown for each facility: <T2>XXXX</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. This firm is the owner or operator of the following UIC facilitiesfor which financial assurance for plugging and abandonment is requiredunder 40 CFR Part 144. The current closure cost estimates as required by40 CFR 144.62 are shown for each facility: <T2>XXXX</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This firm [insert ``is required'' or ``is not required''] to filea Form 10K with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) for the latestfiscal year. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The fiscal year of this firm ends on [month, day]. The figures forthe following items marked with an asterisk are derived from this firm'sindependently audited, year-end financial statements for the latest completedfiscal year, ended [date]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">[Fill in part A if you are using the financial test to demonstratecoverage <T3>only </T3>for the liability requirements.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Part A. Liability Coverage for Accidental Occurrences </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">[Fill in Alternative I if the criteria of paragraph (f)(1)(i) of andSection;264.147 or andSection; 265.147 are used. Fill in Alternative II if the criteriaof paragraph (f)(1)(ii) of andSection; 264.147 or andSection; 265.147 are used.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,4,r20,xs24,5 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="28"/><T2>Alternative I </T2><ITAG tagnum="1">1. <D>Amount of annual aggregate liability coverage to be demonstrated </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*2. <D>Current assets </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*3. <D>Current liabilities </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. <D>Net working capital (line 2 minus line 3) </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*5. <D>Tangible net worth </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*6. <D>If less than 90% or assets are located in the U.S., given total U.S.assets </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D/>  <D/>Yes <D>No  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">7. <D/>Is line 5 at least $10 million? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8. <D/>Is line 4 at least 6 times line 1? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9. <D/>Is line 5 at least 6 times line 1?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*10. <D/>Are at least 90% of assets located in the U.S.? If not, completeline 11. <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">11. <D/>Is line 6 at least 6 times line 1? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><T2>Alternative II </T2><ITAG tagnum="1">1. <D>Amount of annual aggregate liability coverage to be demonstrated </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. <D>Current bond rating of most recent issuance and name of rating service</D><D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. <D>Date of issuance of bond </D><D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. <D>Date of maturity of bond </D><D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*5. <D>Tangible net worth </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*6. <D>Total assets in U.S. (required only if less than 90% of assets are locatedin the U.S.) </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D/>  <D/>Yes <D>No  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">7. <D/>Is line 5 at least $10 million? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8. <D/>Is line 5 at least 6 times line 1? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9. <D/>Are at least 90% of assets located in the U.S.? If not, completeline 10. <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10. <D/>Is line 6 at least 6 times line 1? <D> </D><D/></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">[Fill in part B if you are using the financial test to demonstrateassurance of both liability coverage <T3>and </T3>closure or post-closure care.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Part B. Closure or Post-Closure Care and Liability Coverage </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">[Fill in Alternative I if the criteria of paragraphs (f)(1)(i) ofandSection; 264.143 or andSection; 264.145 and (f)(1)(i) of andSection; 264.147are used or if the criteria of paragraphs (e)(1)(i) of andSection; 265.143or andSection; 265.145 and (f)(1)(i) of andSection; 265.147 are used. Fillin Alternative II if the criteria of paragraphs (f)(1)(ii) of andSection;264.143 or andSection; 264.145 and (f)(1)(ii) of andSection; 264.147 are usedor if the criteria of paragraphs (e)(1)(ii) of andSection; 265.143 or andSection;265.145 and (f)(1)(ii) of andSection; 265.147 are used.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,4,r20,xs24,5 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="28"/><T2>Alternative I </T2><ITAG tagnum="1">1. <D>Sum of current closure and post-closure cost estimates (total of </D><T3>all </T3>cost estimates listed above) <D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. <D>Amount of annual aggregate liability coverage to be demonstrated </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. <D>Sum of lines 1 and 2 </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*4. <D>Total liabilities (if any portion of your closure or post-closure costestimates is included in your total liabilities, you may deduct that portionfrom this line and add that amount to lines 5 and 6) </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*5. <D>Tangible net worth </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*6. <D>Net worth </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*7. <D>Current assets </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*8. <D>Current liabilities </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9. <D>Net working capital (line 7 minus line 8) </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*10. <D>The sum of net income plus depreciation, depletion, and amortization</D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*11. <D>Total assets in U.S. (required only if less than 90% of assets are locatedin the U.S.) </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D/>  <D/>Yes <D>No  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">12. <D/>Is line 5 at least $10 million? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">13. <D/>Is line 5 at least 6 times line 3? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">14. <D/>Is line 9 at least 6 times line 3? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*15. <D/>Are at least 90% of assets located in the U.S.? If not, completeline 16. <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">16. <D/>Is line 11 at least 6 times line 3? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">17. <D/>Is line 4 divided by line 6 less than 2.0? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">18. <D/>Is line 10 divided by line 4 greater than 0.1? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">19. <D/>Is line 7 divided by line 8 greater than 1.5? <D> </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><T2>Alternative II </T2><ITAG tagnum="1">1. <D>Sum of current closure and post-closure cost estimates (total of </D><T3>all</T3> cost estimates listed above) <D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. <D>Amount of annual aggregate liability coverage to be demonstrated </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. <D>Sum of lines 1 and 2 </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. <D>Current bond rating of most recent issuance and name of rating service</D><D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. <D>Date of issuance of bond </D><D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. <D>Date of maturity of bond </D><D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*7. <D>Tangible net worth (if any portion of the closure or post-closure costestimates is included in ``total liabilities'' on your financial statementsyou may add that portion to this line) </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*8. <D>Total assets in the U.S. (required only if less than 90% of assets arelocated in the U.S.) </D><D>$ </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D/>  <D/>Yes <D>No  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">9. <D/>Is line 7 at least $10 million? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10. <D/>Is line 7 at least 6 times line 3? <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">*11. <D/>Are at least 90% of assets located in the U.S.? If not, completeline 12. <D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12. <D/>Is line 8 at least 6 times line 3? <D> </D><D/></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I hereby certify that the wording of this letter is identical to thewording specified in 40 CFR 264.151(g) as such regulations were constitutedon the date shown immediately below.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">[Signature]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">[Name]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">[Title]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">[Date]</ITAG>6. Section 264.151(h)(2) is amended by revising the heading for the ``CorporateGuarantee for Liability Coverage'' to read ``Guarantee for Liability Coverage''and by removing ``corporate'' from paragraph (h)(2); and by removing paragraph12 of the ``Guarantee for Liability Coverage''; redesignating paragraphs4 through 11 as paragraphs 5 through 12, adding new paragraphs 4, 13 and14; and revising paragraph 10; to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(h) * * * (2) * * * <ITAG tagnum="74">Guarantee for Liability Coverage </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Such obligation does not apply to any of the following: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Bodily injury or property damage for which [insert owner or operator]is obligated to pay damages by reason of the assumption of liability ina contract or agreement. This exclusion does not apply to liability fordamages that [insert owner or operator] would be obligated to pay in theabsnce of the contract or agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Any obligation of [insert owner or operator] under a workers'compensation, disability benefits, or unemployment compensation law orany similar law. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Bodily injury to: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) An employee of [insert owner or operator] arising from, and inthe course of, employment by [insert owner or operator]; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The spouse, child, parent, brother or sister of that employeeas a consequence of, or arising from, and in the course of employment by[insert owner or operator]. This exclusion applies: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Whether [insert owner or operator] may be liable as an employeror in any other capacity; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) To any obligation to share damages with or repay another personwho must pay damages because of the injury to persons identified in paragraphs(1) and (2). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Bodily injury or property damage arising out of the ownership,maintenance, use, or entrustment to others of any aircraft, motor vehicleor watercraft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Property damage to: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Any property owned, rented, or occupied by [insert owner or operator];</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Premises that are sold, given away or abandoned by [insert owneror operator] if the property damage arises out of any part of those premises;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Property loaned to [insert owner or operator]; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Personal property in the care, custody or control of [insert owneror operator]; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) That particular part of real property on which [insert owner oroperator] or any contractors or subcontractors working directly or indirectlyon behalf of [insert owner or operator] are performing operations, if theproperty damage arises out of these operations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. [Insert the following language if the guarantor is (a) a director higher-tier corporate parent, or (b) a firm whose parent corporationis also the parent corporation of the owner or operator]: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Guarantor may terminate this guarantee by sending notice by certifiedmail to the EPA Regional Administrator(s) for the Region(s) in which thefacility(ies) is(are) located and to [owner or operator], provided thatthis guarantee may not be terminated unless and until [the owner or operator]obtains, and the EPA Regional Administrator(s) approve(s), alternate liabilitycoverage complying with 40 CFR 264.147 and/or 265.147. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">[Insert the following language if the guarantor is a firm qualifyingas a guarantor due to its ``substantial business relationship'' with theowner or operator]: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Guarantor may terminate this guarantee 120 days following receiptof notification, through certified mail, by the EPA Regional Administrator(s)for the Region(s) in which the facility(ies) is(are) located and by [theowner or operator]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13. The Guarantor shall satisfy a third-party liability claim onlyon receipt of one of the following documents:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Certification from the Principal and the third-party claimant(s)that the liability claim should be paid. The certification must be wordedas follows, except that instructions in brackets are to be replaced withthe relevant information and the brackets deleted: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Certification of Valid Claim </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The undersigned, as parties [insert Principal] and [insert name andaddress of third-party claimant(s)], hereby certify that the claim of bodilyinjury and/or property damage cuased by a [sudden or nonsudden] accidentaloccurrence arising from operating [Principal's] hazardous waste treatment,storage, or disposal facility should be paid in the amount of $[    ].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signatures] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Principal</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Notary)  Date</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signatures] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Claimant(s)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Notary)  Date</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) A valid final court order establishing a judgment against thePrincipal for bodily injury or property damage caused by sudden or nonsuddenaccidental occurrences arising from the operation of the Principal's facilityor group of facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14. In the event of combination of this guarantee with another mechanismto meet liability requirements, this guarantee will be considered [insert``primary'' or ``excess''] coverage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I hereby certify that the wording of the guarantee is identical tothe wording specified in 40 CFR 264.151(h)(2) as such regulations wereconstituted on the date shown immediately below.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Effective date: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Name of guarantor] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Authorized signature for guarantor] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Name of person signing] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Title of person signing] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Signature of witness of notary:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG>7. In andSection;264.151(i), paragraph 2.(d) of the ``Hazardous Waste FacilityLiability Endorsement'' is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(i) * * * <ITAG tagnum="74">Hazardous Waste Facility Liability Endorsement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Cancellation of this endorsement, whether by the Insurer, theinsured, a parent corporation providing insurance coverage for its subsidiary,or by a firm having an insurable interest in and obtaining liability insuranceon behalf of the owner or operator of the hazardous waste management facility,will be effective only upon written notice and only after the expirationof 60 days after a copy of such written notice is received by the RegionalAdministrator(s) of the EPA Region(s) in which the facility(ies) is(are)located. </ITAG>8. In andSection;264.151(j), paragraph 2.(d) of the ``Hazardous Waste FacilityCertificate of Liability Insurance'' is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(j) * * * <ITAG tagnum="74">Hazardous Waste Facility Certificate of Liability Insurance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Cancellation of the insurance, whether by the insurer, the insured,a parent corportation providing insurance coverage for its subsidiary,or by a firm having an insurable interest in and obtaining liability insuranceon behalf of the owner or operator of the hazardous waste management facility,will be effective only upon written notice and only after the expirationof 60 days after a copy of such written notice is received by the RegionalAdministrator(s) of the EPA Region(s) in which the facility(ies) is(are)located. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>9. In andSection;264.151, a new paragraph (k) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(k) A letter of credit, as specified in andSection;264.147(h) or andSection;265.147(h)of this chapter, must be worded as follows, except that instructions inbrackets are to be replaced with the relevant information and the bracketsdeleted:<ITAG tagnum="74">Irrevocable Standby Letter of Credit </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Name and Address of Issuing Institution </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Regional Administrator(s) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Region(s) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">U.S. Environmental Protection Agency</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dear Sir or Madam: We hereby establish our Irrevocable Standby Letterof Credit No. <T2>XXXX</T2> in the favor of any and all third-party liability claimants,at the request and for the account of [owner's or operator's name and address]for third-party liability awards or settlements up to [in words] U.S. dollars$<T2>XXXX</T2> per occurrence and the annual aggregate amount of [in words]U.S. dollars $<T2>XXXX</T2>, for sudden accidental occurrences and/or for third-partyliability awards or settlements up to the amount of [in words] U.S. dollars$<T2>XXXX</T2> per occurrence, and the annual aggregate amount of [in words]U.S. dollars $<T2>XXXX</T2>, for nonsudden accidental occurrences available upon presentationof a sight draft, bearing reference to this letter of credit No. <T2>XXXX</T2>, and (1) a signed certificate reading as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Certification of Valid Claim </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The undersigned, as parties [insert principal] and [insert name andaddress of third-party claimants], hereby certify that the claim of bodilyinjury [and/or] property damage caused by a [sudden or nonsudden] accidentaloccurrence arising from operations of [principal's] hazardous waste treatment,storage, or disposal facility should be paid in the amount of $<T2>XXXX</T2>. We hereby certify that the claim does not apply to any ofthe following: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Bodily injury or property damage for which [insert principal]is obligated to pay damages by reason of the assumption of liability ina contract or agreement. This exclusion does not apply to liability fordamages that [insert principal] would be obligated to pay in the absenceof the contract or agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Any obligation of [insert principal] under a workers' compensation,disability benefits, or unemployment compensation law or any similar law.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Bodily injury to: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) An employee of [insert principal] arising from, and in the courseof, employment by [insert principal]; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The spouse, child, parent, brother or sister of that employeeas a consequence of, or arising from, and in the course of employment by[insert principal]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">This exclusion applies: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Whether [insert principal] may be liable as an employer or inany other capacity; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) To any obligation to share damages with or repay another personwho must pay damages because of the injury to persons identified in paragraphs(1) and (2). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Bodily injury or property damage arising out of the ownership,maintenance, use, or entrustment to others of any aircraft, motor vehicleor watercraft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Property damage to: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Any property owned, rented, or occupied by [insert principal];</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Premises that are sold, given away or abandoned by [insert principal]if the property damage arises out of any part of those premises; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Property loaned to [insert principal]; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Personal property in the care, custody or control of [insert principal];</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) That particular part of real property on which [insert principal]or any contractors or subcontractors working directly or indirectly onbehalf of [insert principal] are performing operations, if the propertydamage arises out of these operations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signatures] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Principal</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signatures] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Claimant(s)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">or (2) a valid final court order establishing a judgment against theprincipal for bodily injury or property damage caused by a sudden or nonsuddenaccidental occurrence arising from operation of the principal's facilityor group of facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This letter of credit is effective as of [date] and shall expire on[date at least one year later], but such expiration date shall be automaticallyextended for a period of [at least one year] on [date] and on each successiveexpiration date, unless, at least 120 days before the current expirationdate, we notify you, the USEPA Regional Administrator for Region [Regionandplusmin;], and [owner's or operator's name] by certified mail that wehave decided not to extend this letter of credit beyond the current expirationdate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Whenever this letter of credit is drawn on under and in compliancewith the terms of this credit, we shall duly honor such draft upon presentationto us. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In the event that this letter of credit is used in combination withanother mechanism for liability coverage, this letter of credit shall beconsidered [insert ``primary'' or ``excess''] coverage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">We certify that the wording of this letter of credit is identicalto the wording specified in 40 CFR 264.151(k) as such regulations wereconstituted on the date shown immediately below.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signature(s) and title(s) of official(s) of issuing institution]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Date]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This credit is subject to [insert ``the most recent edition of theUniform Customs and Practice for Documentary Credits, published by theInternational Chamber of Commerce'' or ``the Uniform Commercial Code''].</ITAG>10. In andSection; 264.151, a new paragraph (1) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(1) A surety bond, as specified in andSection; 264.147(h) or andSection; 265.147(h)of this chapter, must be worded as follows: except that instructions inbrackets are to be replaced with the relevant information and the bracketsdeleted:<ITAG tagnum="74">Payment Bond</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Surety Bond No. [Insert number]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Parties [Insert name and address of owner or operator], Principal,incorporated in [Insert State of incorporation] of [Insert city and Stateof principal place of business] and [Insert name and address of suretycompany(ies)], Surety Company(ies), of [Insert surety(ies) place of business].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">EPA Identification Number, name, and address for each facility guaranteedby this bond: <T2>XXXX</T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,r25,r25</C> <H1>  </H1><H1>Sudden accidental occurrences </H1><H1>Nonsudden accidental occurrences</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Penal Sum Per Occurrence <D>[insert amount] </D><D>[insert amount]</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Annual Aggregate <D>[insert amount] </D><D>[insert amount]</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Purpose: This is an agreement between the Surety(ies) and the Principalunder which the Surety(ies), its(their) successors and assignees, agreeto be responsible for the payment of claims against the Principal for bodilyinjury and/or property damage to third parties caused by [``sudden'' and/or``nonsudden''] accidental occurrences arising from operations of the facilityor group of facilities in the sums prescribed herein; subject to the governingprovisions and the following conditions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Governing Provisions:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Section 3004 of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of1976, as amended.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Rules and regulations of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency(EPA), particularly 40 CFR [``andSection; 264.147'' or ``andSection; 265.147''](if applicable).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Rules and regulations of the governing State agency (if applicable)[insert citation].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Conditions:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The Principal is subject to the applicable governing provisionsthat require the Principal to have and maintain liability coverage forbodily injury and property damage to third parties caused by [``sudden''and/or ``nonsudden''] accidental occurrences arising from operations ofthe facility or group of facilities. Such obligation does not apply toany of the following:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Bodily injury or property damage for which [insert principal]is obligated to pay damages by reason of the assumption of liability ina contract or agreement. This exclusion does not apply to liability fordamages that [insert principal] would be obligated to pay in the absenceof the contract or agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Any obligation of [insert principal] under a workers' compensation,disability benefits, or unemployment compensation law or similar law.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Bodily injury to:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) An employee of [insert principal] arising from, and in the courseof, employment by [insert principal]; or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The spouse, child, parent, brother or sister of that employeeas a consequence of, or arising from, and in the course of employment by[insert principal]. This exclusion applies:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Whether [insert principal] may be liable as an employer or inany other capacity; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) To any obligation to share damages with or repay another personwho must pay damages because of the injury to persons identified in paragraphs(1) and (2).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Bodily injury or property damage arising out of the ownership,maintenance, use, or entrustment to others of any aircraft, motor vehicleor watercraft.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Property damage to:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Any property owned, rented, or occupied by [insert principal];</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Premises that are sold, given away or abandoned by [insert principal]if the property damage arises out of any part of those premises;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Property loaned to [insert principal];</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Personal property in the care, custody or control of [insert principal];</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) That particular part of real property on which [insert principal]or any contractors or subcontractors working directly or indirectly onbehalf of [insert principal] are performing operations, if the propertydamage arises out of these operations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) This bond assures that the Principal will satisfy valid thirdparty liability claims, as described in condition 1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) If the Principal fails to satisfy a valid third party liabilityclaim, as described above, the Surety(ies) becomes liable on this bondobligation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The Surety(ies) shall satisfy a third party liability claim onlyupon the receipt of one of the following documents:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Certification from the Principal and the third party claimant(s)that the liability claim should be paid. The certification must be wordedas follows, except that instructions in brackets are to be replaced withthe relevant information and the brackets deleted:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Certification of Valid Claim</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The undersigned, as parties [insert name of Principal] and [insertname and address of third party claimant(s)], hereby certify that the claimof bodily injury and/or property damage caused by a [sudden or nonsudden]accidential occurrence arising from operating [Principal's] hazardous wastetreatment, storage, or disposal facility should be paid in the amount of$[  ].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signature]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Principal </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Notary]  Date</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signature(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Claimant(s)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Notary]  Date</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">or (b) A valid final court order establishing a judgment against thePrincipal for bodily injury or property damage caused by sudden or nonsuddenaccidental occurrences arising from the operation of the Principal's facilityor group of facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) In the event of combination of this bond with another mechanismfor liability coverage, this bond will be considered [insert ``primary''or ``excess''] coverage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) The liability of the Surety(ies) shall not be discharged by anypayment or succession of payments hereunder, unless and until such paymentor payments shall amount in the aggregate to the penal sum of the bond.In no event shall the obligation of the Surety(ies) hereunder exceed theamount of said annual aggregate penal sum, provided that the Surety(ies)furnish(es) notice to the Regional Administrator forthwith of all claimsfiled and payments made by the Surety(ies) under this bond.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) The Surety(ies) may cancel the bond by sending notice of cancellationby certified mail to the Principal and the USEPA Regional Administratorfor Region [Region andplusmin;], provided, however, that cancellation shallnot occur during the 120 days beginning on the date of receipt of the noticeof cancellation by the Principal and the Regional Administrator, as evidencedby the return receipt.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) The Principal may terminate this bond by sending written noticeto the Surety(ies) and to the EPA Regional Administrator(s) of the EPARegion(s) in which the bonded facility(ies) is (are) located.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) The Surety(ies) hereby waive(s) notification of amendments toapplicable laws, statutes, rules and regulations and agree(s) that no suchamendment shall in any way alleviate its (their) obligation on this bond.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) This bond is effective from [insert date] (12:01 a.m., standardtime, at the address of the Principal as stated herein) and shall continuein force until terminated as described above.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In Witness Whereof, the Principal and Surety(ies) have executed thisBond and have affixed their seals on the date set forth above.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The persons whose signatures appear below hereby certify that theyare authorized to execute this surety bond on behalf of the Principal andSurety(ies) and that the wording of this surety bond is identical to thewording specified in 40 CFR 264.151(1), as such regulations were constitutedon the date this bond was executed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">PRINCIPAL</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signature(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Name(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Title(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Corporate Seal]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">CORPORATE SURETY[IES]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Name and address]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">State of incorporation:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Liability Limit: $</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signature(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Name(s) and title(s)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Corporate seal]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[For every co-surety, provide signature(s), corporate seal, and otherinformation in the same manner as for Surety above.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Bond premium: $</ITAG>11. In andSection; 264.151, a new paragraph (m) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(m)(1) A trust agreement, as specified in andSection; 264.147(j) or andSection;265.147(j) of this chapter, must be worded as follows, except that instructionsin brackets are to be replaced with the relevant information and the bracketsdeleted:<ITAG tagnum="74">Trust Agreement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Trust Agreement, the ``Agreement,'' entered into as of [date] by andbetween [name of the owner or operator] a [name of State] [insert ``corporation,''``partnership,'' ``association,'' or ``proprietorship''], the ``Grantor,''and [name of corporate trustee], [insert, ``incorporated in the State of<T2>XXXX</T2>'' or ``a national bank''], the ``trustee.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Whereas, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, ``EPA,''an agency of the United States Government, has established certain regulationsapplicable to the Grantor, requiring that an owner or operator of a hazardouswaste management facility or group of facilities must demonstrate financialresponsibility for bodily injury and property damage to third parties causedby sudden accidental and/or nonsudden accidental occurrences arising fromoperations of the facility or group of facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Whereas, the Grantor has elected to establish a trust to assure allor part of such financial responsibility for the facilities identifiedherein.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Whereas, the Grantor, acting through its duly authorized officers,has selected the Trustee to be the trustee under this agreement, and theTrustee is willing to act as trustee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Now, therefore, the Grantor and the Trustee agree as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 1. <T3>Definitions. </T3>As used in this Agreement:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) The term ``Grantor'' means the owner or operator who enters intothis Agreement and any successors or assigns of the Grantor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The term ``Trustee'' means the Trustee who enters into this Agreementand any successor Trustee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 2. <T3>Identification of Facilities. </T3>This agreement pertains to the facilitiesidentified on attached schedule A [on schedule A, for each facility listthe EPA Identification Number, name, and address of the facility(ies) andthe amount of liability coverage, or portions thereof, if more than oneinstrument affords combined coverage as demonstrated by this Agreement].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 3. <T3>Establishment of Fund. </T3>The Grantor and the Trustee hereby establisha trust fund, hereinafter the ``Fund,'' for the benefit of any and allthird parties injured or damaged by [sudden and/or nonsudden] accidentaloccurrences arising from operation of the facility(ies) covered by thisguarantee, in the amounts of <T2>XXXXXX</T2> [up to $1 million] per occurrence and <T2>XXXXXX</T2> [up to $2 million] annual aggregate for sudden accidentaloccurrences and <T2>XXXXXX</T2> [up to $3 million] per occurrence and <T2>XXXXXX</T2> [up to $6 million] annual aggregate for nonsudden occurrences,except that the Fund is not established for the benefit of third partiesfor the following:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Bodily injury or property damage for which [insert Grantor] isobligated to pay damages by reason of the assumption of liability in acontract or agreement. This exclusion does not apply to liability for damagesthat [insert Grantor] would be obligated to pay in the absence of the contractor agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Any obligation of [insert Grantor] under a workers' compensation,disability benefits, or unemployment compensation law or any similar law.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Bodily injury to:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) An employee of [insert Grantor] arising from, and in the courseof, employment by [insert Grantor]; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The spouse, child, parent, brother or sister of that employeeas a consequence of, or arising from, and in the course of employment by[insert Grantor].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This exclusion applies:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Whether [insert Grantor] may be liable as an employer or in anyother capacity; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) To any obligation to share damages with or repay another personwho must pay damages because of the injury to persons identified in paragraphs(1) and (2).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Bodily injury or property damage arising out of the ownership,maintenance, use, or entrustment to others of any aircraft, motor vehicleor watercraft.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Property damage to:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Any property owned, rented, or occupied by [insert Grantor]; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Premises that are sold, given away or abandoned by [insert Grantor]if the property damage arises out of any part of those premises; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Property loaned to [insert Grantor]; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Personal property in the care, custody or control of [insert Grantor];</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) That particular part of real property on which [insert Grantor]or any contractors or subcontractors working directly or indirectly onbehalf of [insert Grantor] are performing operations, if the property damagearises out of these operations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In the event of combination with another mechanism for liability coverage,the fund shall be considered [insert ``primary'' or ``excess''] coverage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Fund is established initially as consisting of the property, whichis acceptable to the Trustee, described in Schedule B attached hereto.Such property and any other property subsequently transferred to the Trusteeis referred to as the Fund, together with all earnings and profits thereon,less any payments or distributions made by the Trustee pursuant to thisAgreement. The Fund shall be held by the Trustee, IN TRUST, as hereinafterprovided. The Trustee shall not be responsible nor shall it undertake anyresponsibility for the amount or adequacy of, nor any duty to collect fromthe Grantor, any payments necessary to discharge any liabilities of theGrantor established by EPA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 4. <T3>Payment for Bodily Injury or Property Damage. </T3>The Trustee shallsatisfy a third party liability claim by making payments from the Fundonly upon receipt of one of the following documents; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Certification from the Grantor and the third party claimant(s)that the liability claim should be paid. The certification must be wordedas follows, except that instructions in brackets are to be replaced withthe relevant information and the brackets deleted: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Certification of Valid Claim </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The undersigned, as parties [insert Grantor] and [insert name andaddress of third party claimant(s)], hereby certify that the claim of bodilyinjury and/or property damage caused by a [sudden or nonsudden] accidentaloccurrence arising from operating [Grantor's] hazardous waste treatment,storage, or disposal facility should be paid in the amount of $[   ].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signatures] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Grantor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signatures] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Claimant(s)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) A valid final court order establishing a judgment against theGrantor for bodily injury or property damage caused by sudden or nonsuddenaccidental occurrences arising from the operation of the Grantor's facilityor group of facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 5. <T3>Payments Comprising the Fund. </T3>Payments made to the Trustee forthe Fund shall consist of cash or securities acceptable to the Trustee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 6. <T3>Trustee Management. </T3>The Trustee shall invest and reinvest theprincipal and income, in accordance with general investment policies andguidelines which the Grantor may communicate in writing to the Trusteefrom time to time, subject, however, to the provisions of this section.In investing, reinvesting, exchanging, selling, and managing the Fund,the Trustee shall discharge his duties with respect to the trust fund solelyin the interest of the beneficiary and with the care, skill, prudence,and diligence under the circumstance then prevailing which persons of prudence,acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters, would use inthe conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims; <T3>except that</T3>: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Securities or other obligations of the Grantor, or any other owneror operator of the facilities, or any of their affiliates as defined inthe Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, 15 U.S.C. 80a-2.(a), shallnot be acquired or <T3>held </T3>unless they are securities or other obligations of the Federalor a State government; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The Trustee is authorized to invest the Fund in time or demanddeposits of the Trustee, to the extent insured by an agency of the Federalor State government; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The Trustee is authorized to hold cash awaiting investment ordistribution uninvested for a reasonable time and without liability forthe payment of interest thereon.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 7. <T3>Commingling and Investment. </T3>The Trustee is expressly authorizedin its discretion:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) To transfer from time to time any or all of the assets of theFund to any common commingled, or collective trust fund created by theTrustee in which the fund is eligible to participate, subject to all ofthe provisions thereof, to be commingled with the assets of other trustsparticipating therein; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) To purchase shares in any investment company registered underthe Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. 81a-1 et seq., includingone which may be created, managed, underwritten, or to which investmentadvice is rendered or the shares of which are sold by the Trustee. TheTrustee may vote such shares in its discretion.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 8. <T3>Express Powers of Trustee. </T3>Without in any way limiting the powersand discretions conferred upon the Trustee by the other provisions of thisAgreement or by law, the Trustee is expressly authorized and empowered:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) To sell, exchange, convey, transfer, or otherwise dispose of anyproperty held by it, by public or private sale. No person dealing withthe Trustee shall be bound to see to the application of the purchase moneyor to inquire into the validity or expediency of any such sale or otherdisposition;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) To make, execute, acknowledge, and deliver any and all documentsof transfer and conveyance and any and all other instruments that may benecessary or appropriate to carry out the powers herein granted;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) To register any securities held in the Fund in its own name orin the name of a nominee and to hold any security in bearer form or inbook entry, or to combine certificates representing such securities withcertificates of the same issue held by the Trustee in other fiduciary capacities,or to deposit or arrange for the deposit of such securities in a qualifiedcentral depositary even though, when so deposited, such securities maybe merged and held in bulk in the name of the nominee of such depositarywith other securities deposited therein by another person, or to depositor arrange for the deposit of any securities issued by the United StatesGovernment, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, with a Federal Reservebank, but the books and records of the Trustee shall at all times showthat all such securities are part of the Fund;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) To deposit any cash in the Fund in interest-bearing accounts maintainedor savings certificates issued by the Trustee, in its separate corporatecapacity, or in any other banking institution affiliated with the Trustee,to the extent insured by an agency of the Federal or State government;and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) To compromise or otherwise adjust all claims in favor of or againstthe Fund.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 9. <T3>Taxes and Expenses. </T3>All taxes of any kind that may be assessedor levied against or in respect of the Fund and all brokerage commissionsincurred by the Fund shall be paid from the Fund. All other expenses incurredby the Trustee in connection with the administration of this Trust, includingfees for legal services rendered to the Trustee, the compensation of theTrustee to the extent not paid directly by the Grantor, and all other propercharges and disbursements of the Trustee shall be paid from the Fund.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 10. <T3>Annual Valuations. </T3>The Trustee shall annually, at least 30 daysprior to the anniversary date of establishment of the Fund, furnish tothe Grantor and to the appropriate EPA Regional Administrator a statementconfirming the value of the Trust. Any securities in the Fund shall bevalued at market value as of no more than 60 days prior to the anniversarydate of establishment of the Fund. The failure of the Grantor to objectin writing to the Trustee within 90 days after the statement has been furnishedto the Grantor and the EPA Regional Administrator shall constitute a conclusivelybinding assent by the Grantor barring the Grantor from asserting any claimor liability against the Trustee with respect to matters disclosed in thestatement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 11. <T3>Advice of Counsel. </T3>The Trustee may from time to time consult withcounsel, who may be counsel to the Grantor with respect to any questionarising as to the construction of this Agreement or any action to be takenhereunder. The Trustee shall be fully protected, to the extent permittedby law, in acting upon the advice of counsel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 12. <T3>Trustee Compensation. </T3>The Trustee shall be entitled to reasonablecompensation for its services as agreed upon in writing from time to timewith the Grantor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 13. <T3>Successor Trustee. </T3>The Trustee may resign or the Grantor may replacethe Trustee, but such resignation or replacement shall not be effectiveuntil the Grantor has appointed a successor trustee and this successoraccepts the appointment. The successor trustee shall have the same powersand duties as those conferred upon the Trustee hereunder. Upon the successortrustee's acceptance of the appointment, the Trustee shall assign, transfer,and pay over to the successor trustee the funds and properties then constitutingthe Fund. If for any reason the Grantor cannot or does not act in the eventof the resignation of the Trustee, the Trustee may apply to a court ofcompetent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor trustee or forinstructions. The successor trustee shall specify the date on which itassumes administration of the trust in a writing sent to the Grantor, theEPA Regional Administrator, and the present Trustee by certified mail 10days before such change becomes effective. Any expenses incurred by theTrustee as a result of any of the acts contemplated by this section shallbe paid as provided in Section 9.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 14. <T3>Instructions to the Trustee. </T3>All orders, requests, and instructionsby the Grantor to the Trustee shall be in writing, signed by such personsas are designated in the attached Exhibit A or such other designees asthe Grantor may designate by amendments to Exhibit A. The Trustee shallbe fully protected in acting without inquiry in accordance with the Grantor'sorders, requests, and instructions. All orders, requests, and instructionsby the EPA Regional Administrator to the Trustee shall be in writing, signedby the EPA Regional Administrators of the Regions in which the facilitiesare located, or their designees, and the Trustee shall act and shall befully protected in acting in accordance with such orders, requests, andinstructions. The Trustee shall have the right to assume, in the absenceof written notice to the contrary, that no event constituting a changeor a termination of the authority of any person to act on behalf of theGrantor or EPA hereunder has occurred. The Trustee shall have no duty toact in the absence of such orders, requests, and instructions from theGrantor and/or EPA, except as provided for herein.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 15. <T3>Notice of Nonpayment. </T3>If a payment for bodily injury or propertydamage is made under Section 4 of this trust, the Trustee shall notifythe Grantor of such payment and the amount(s) thereof within five (5) workingdays. The Grantor shall, on or before the anniversary date of the establishmentof the Fund following such notice, either make payments to the Trusteein amounts sufficient to cause the trust to return to its value immediatelyprior to the payment of claims under Section 4, or shall provide writtenproof to the Trustee that other financial assurance for liability coveragehas been obtained equalling the amount necessary to return the trust toits value prior to the payment of claims. If the Grantor does not eithermake payments to the Trustee or provide the Trustee with such proof, theTrustee shall within 10 working days after the anniversary date of theestablishment of the Fund provide a written notice of nonpayment to theEPA Regional Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 16. <T3>Amendment of Agreement. </T3>This Agreement may be amended by an instrumentin writing executed by the Grantor, the Trustee, and the appropriate EPARegional Administrator, or by the Trustee and the appropriate EPA RegionalAdministrator if the Grantor ceases to exist.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 17. <T3>Irrevocability and Termination. </T3>Subject to the right of the partiesto amend this Agreement as provided in Section 16, this Trust shall beirrevocable and shall continue until terminated at the written agreementof the Grantor, the Trustee, and the EPA Regional Administrator, or bythe Trustee and the EPA Regional Administrator, if the Grantor ceases toexist. Upon termination of the Trust, all remaining trust property, lessfinal trust administration expenses, shall be delivered to the Grantor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Regional Administrator will agree to termination of the Trustwhen the owner or operator substitutes alternate financial assurance asspecified in this section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 18. <T3>Immunity and Indemnification. </T3>The Trustee shall not incur personalliability of any nature in connection with any act or omission, made ingood faith, in the administration of this Trust, or in carrying out anydirections by the Grantor or the EPA Regional Administrator issued in accordancewith this Agreement. The Trustee shall be indemnified and saved harmlessby the Grantor or from the Trust Fund, or both, from and against any personalliability to which the Trustee may be subjected by reason of any act orconduct in its official capacity, including all expenses reasonably incurredin its defense in the event the Grantor fails to provide such defense.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 19. <T3>Choice of Law. </T3>This Agreement shall be administered, construed,and enforced according to the laws of the State of [enter name of State].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 20. <T3>Interpretation. </T3>As used in this Agreement, words in the singularinclude the plural and words in the plural include the singular. The descriptiveheadings for each section of this Agreement shall not affect the interpretationor the legal efficacy of this Agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In Witness Whereof the parties have caused this Agreement to be executedby their respective officers duly authorized and their corporate sealsto be hereunto affixed and attested as of the date first above written.The parties below certify that the wording of this Agreement is identicalto the wording specified in 40 CFR 264.151(m) as such regulations wereconstituted on the date first above written.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signature of Grantor] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Title] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Attest: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Title] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Seal] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signature of Trustee]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Attest:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Title] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Seal] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The following is an example of the certification of acknowledgementwhich must accompany the trust agreement for a trust fund as specifiedin andSection;andSection;264.147(j) or 265.147(j) of this chapter. State requirementsmay differ on the proper content of this acknowledgement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">State of </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">County of</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">On this [date], before me personally came [owner or operator] to meknown, who, being by me duly sworn, did depose and say that she/he residesat [address], that she/he is [title] of [corporation], the corporationdescribed in and which executed the above instrument; that she/he knowsthe seal of said corporation; that the seal affixed to such instrumentis such corporate seal; that it was so affixed by order of the Board ofDirectors of said corporation, and that she/he signed her/his name theretoby like order.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[Signature of Notary Public]</ITAG>40 CFR Part 265 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 265_INTERIM STATUS STANDARDS FOR OWNERS AND OPERATORS OF HAZARDOUSWASTE TREATMENT, STORAGE, AND DISPOSAL FACILITIES: LIABILITY COVERAGE</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 265 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 42 U.S.C. 6905, 6912(a), 6924, and 6925.</ITAG>2. In andSection; 265.141, new paragraph (h) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 264.141 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions of terms as used in this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(h) ``Substantial business relationship'' means the extent of a businessrelationship necessary under applicable State law to make a guarantee contractissued incident to that relationship valid and enforceable. A ``substantialbusiness relationship'' must arise from a pattern of recent or ongoingbusiness transactions, in addition to the guarantee itself, such that acurrently existing business relationship between the guarantor and theowner or operator is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the applicableEPA Regional Administrator.3. In andSection; 265.147, paragraph (h) is redesignated as paragraph (k);paragraphs (a) introductory text, (a)(2), (a)(3), (b) introductory text,(b)(2), (b)(3), (b)(4) and (g) heading and (g)(1) introductory text arerevised, and by removing and reserving paragraph (g)(1)(ii); paragraphs(g)(2)(i) and (g)(2)(ii) are amended by removing ``corporate;'' and newparagraphs (a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), (b)(5), (b)(6), (b)(7), (h),(i), and (j) are added, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 265.147 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Liability requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Coverage for sudden accidental occurrences.</T3> An owner or operatorof a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility, or a groupof such facilities, must demonstrate financial responsibility for bodilyinjury and property damage to third parties caused by sudden accidentaloccurrences arising from operations of the facility or group of facilities.The owner or operator must have and maintain liability coverage for suddenaccidental occurrences in the amount of at least $1 million per occurrencewith an annual aggregate of at least $2 million, exclusive of legal defensecosts. This liability coverage may be demonstrated as specified in paragraphs(a) (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(2) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by passinga financial test or using the guarantee for liability coverage as specifiedin paragraph (g) of this section.(3) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga letter of credit for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (h)of this section.(4) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga surety bond for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (i) of thissection.(5) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga trust fund for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (j) of thissection.(6) An owner or operator may demonstrate the required liability coveragethrough the use of combinations of insurance, financial test, guarantee,letter of credit, surety bond, and trust fund, except that the owner oroperator may not combine a financial test covering part of the liabilitycoverage requirement with a guarantee unless the financial statement ofthe owner or operator is not consolidated with the financial statementof the guarantor. The amounts of coverage demonstrated must total at leastthe minimum amounts required by this section. If the owner or operatordemonstrates the required coverage through the use of a combination offinancial assurances under this paragraph, the owner or operator shallspecify at least one such assurance as ``primary'' coverage and shall specifyother assurance as ``excess'' coverage.(7) An owner or operator shall notify the Regional Administrator in writingwithin 30 days (i) whenever a claim for bodily injury or property damagescaused by the operation of a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposalfacility is made against the owner or operator or an instrument providingfinancial assurance for liability coverage under this section and (ii)whenever the amount of financial assurance for liability coverage underthis section provided by a financial instrument authorized by paragraphs(a)(1) through (a)(6) of this section is reduced.(b) <T3>Coverage for nonsudden accidental occurrences.</T3> An owner or operatorof a surface impoundment, landfill, or land treatment facility which isused to manage hazardous waste, or a group of such facilities, must demonstratefinancial responsibility for bodily injury and property damage to thirdparties caused by nonsudden accidental occurrences arising from operationsof the facility or group of facilities. The owner or operator must haveand maintain liability coverage for nonsudden accidental occurrences inthe amount of at least $3 million per occurrence with an annual aggregateof at least $6 million, exclusive of legal defense costs. An owner or operatorwho must meet the requirements of this section may combine the requiredper-occurrence coverage levels for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrencesinto a single per-occurrence level, and combine the required annual aggregatecoverage levels for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences into asingle annual aggregate level. Owners or operators who combine coveragelevels for sudden and nonsudden accidental occurrences must maintain liabilitycoverage in the amount of at least $4 million per occurrence and $8 millionannual aggregate. This liability coverage may be demonstrated as specifiedin paragraph (b) (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(2) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by passinga financial test or using the guarantee for liability coverage as specifiedin paragraphs (f) and (g) of this section.(3) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga letter of credit for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (h)of this section.(4) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga surety bond for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (i) of thissection.  (5) An owner or operator may meet the requirements of this section by obtaininga trust fund for liability coverage as specified in paragraph (j) of thissection.  (6) An owner or operator may demonstrate the required liability coveragethrough the use of combinations of insurance, financial test, guarantee,letter of credit, surety bond, and trust fund, except that the owner oroperator may not combine a financial test covering part of the liabilitycoverage requirement with a guarantee unless the financial statement ofthe owner or operator is not consolidated with the financial statementof the guarantor. The amounts of coverage demonstrated must total at leastthe minimum amounts required by this section. If the owner or operatordemonstrates the required coverage through the use of a combination offinancial assurances under this paragraph, the owner or operator shallspecify at least one such assurance as ``primary'' coverage and shall specifyother assurance as ``excess'' coverage.  (7) An owner or operator shall notify the Regional Administrator in writingwithin 30 days (i) whenever a claim for bodily injury or property damagescaused by the operation of a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposalfacility is made against the owner or operator or an instrument providingfinancial assurance for liability coverage under this section and (ii)whenever the amount of financial assurance for liability coverage underthis section provided by a financial instrument authorized by paragraphs(a)(1) through (a)(6) of this section is reduced. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>(g) <T3>Guarantee for liability coverage. </T3>(1) Subject to paragraph (g)(2)of this section, an owner or operator may meet the requirements of thissection by obtaining a written guarantee, hereinafter referred to as ``guarantee.''The guarantor must be the direct or higher-tier parent corporation of theowner or operator, a firm whose parent corporation is also the parent corporationof the owner or operator, or a firm with a ``substantial business relationship''with the owner or operator. The guarantor must meet the requirements forowners or operators in paragraphs (f)(1) through (f)(6) of this section.The wording of the guarantee must be identical to the wording specifiedin andSection; 264.151(h)(2) of this chapter. A certified copy of the guaranteemust accompany the items sent to the Regional Administrator as specifiedin paragraph (f)(3) of this section. One of these items must be the letterfrom the guarantor's chief financial officer. If the guarantor's parentcorporation is also the parent corporation of the owner or operator, thisletter must describe the value received in consideration of the guarantee.If the guarantor is a firm with a ``substantial business relationship''with the owner or operator, this letter must describe this ``substantialbusiness relationship'' and the value received in consideration of theguarantee. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(h) <T3>Letter of credit for liability coverage. </T3>(1) An owner or operatormay satisfy the requirements of this section by obtaining an irrevocablestandby letter of credit that conforms to the requirements of this paragraphand submitting a copy of the letter of credit to the Regional Administrator. (2) The financial institution issuing the letter of credit must be an entitythat has the authority to issue letters of credit and whose letter of creditoperations are regulated and examined by a Federal or State agency.  (3) The wording of the letter of credit must be identical to the wordingspecified in andSection; 264.151(k) of this chapter.  (i) <T3>Surety bond for liability coverage. </T3>(1) An owner or operator maysatisfy the requirements of this section by obtaining a surety bond thatconforms to the requirements of this paragraph and submitting a copy ofthe bond to the Regional Administrator.  (2) The surety company issuing the bond must be among those listed as acceptablesureties on Federal bonds in the most recent Circular 570 of the U.S. Departmentof the Treasury.  (3) The wording of the surety bond must be identical to the wording specifiedin andSection; 264.151(1) of this chapter.  (4) A surety bond may be used to satisfy the requirements of this sectiononly if the Attorneys General or Insurance Commissioners of (i) the Statein which the surety is incorporated, and (ii) each State in which a facilitycovered by the surety bond is located have submitted a written statementto EPA that a surety bond executed as described in this section and andSection;264.151(1) of this chapter is a legally valid and enforceable obligationin that State.  (j) <T3>Trust fund for liability coverage. </T3>(1) An owner or operator maysatisfy the requirements of this section by establishing a trust fund thatconforms to the requirements of this paragraph and submitting an originallysigned duplicate of the trust agreement to the Regional Administrator. (2) The trustee must be an entity which has the authority to act as a trusteeand whose trust operations are regulated and examined by a Federal or Stateagency.  (3) The trust fund for liability coverage must be funded for the full amountof the liability coverage to be provided by the trust fund before it maybe relied upon to satisfy the requirements of this section. If at any timeafter the trust fund is created the amount of funds in the trust fund isreduced below the full amount of the liability coverage to be provided,the owner or operator, by the anniversary date of the establishment ofthe Fund, must either add sufficient funds to the trust fund to cause itsvalue to equal the full amount of liability coverage to be provided, orobtain other financial assurance as specified in this section to coverthe difference. For purposes of this paragraph, ``the full amount of theliability coverage to be provided'' means the amount of coverage for suddenand/or nonsudden occurrences required to be provided by the owner or operatorby this section, less the amount of financial assurance for liability coveragethat is being provided by other financial assurance mechanisms being usedto demonstrate financial assurance by the owner or operator.  (4) The wording of the trust fund must be identical to the wording specifiedin andSection; 264.151(m) of this part.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-19410 Filed 8-31-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>